CHAPTER I.
More
than a hundred and fifty years ago, there
lived, just without the goodly city of New York, but
far within its present precincts, a worthy Dutch
burgher whose name was not Van Corlear. It is
ventured, however, to borrow that venerable
patronymic
in his behalf, withholding his real name, lest
some of his irascible descendants, jealous of ancestral
fame, may impugn the verity of those family secrets
which are about to be divulged. This prudential
arrangement in relation to names is intended also to
extend to the other personages mentioned in the
following history; and when thus much of fiction is
so frankly acknowledged, it is hoped that the reader
will be therewith content, and will be willing to
concede
to the more material matters the credence they
deserve.
Whether Burleigh Van Corlear was christened after
Queen Elizabeth's treasurer, or whether his baptismal
name (which was usually written and pronounced
Burly) was bestowed in anticipation of his future
figure, it is difficult at this late day to determine.
That he was both rotund and robust, that his
circumference
was equal to his height, and that it was no
easy matter to get
around him
, either literally or
figuratively
,
are points which are, fortunately, better
established. Burley had at one time been an alderman
of the city which now bounded him on the south; and
it required only to look at him to perceive his
qualifications
for that office, and the faithful manner in which
its duties had been discharged. His appearance,
indeed, spoke a volume upon this subject. It was
no small gratification, either, to Mynheer Van
Corlear
to remember the official honors which he had
thus enjoyed, and they formed the theme of much
pleasing reflection. Like many retired statesmen
of later days, he was consoled for present
obscruity
by the consciousness of having once been
2
famous. Newspapers, indeed, were too scarce in that
age to admit of any reasonable hope that he should
ever see his name or titles emblazoned in print; but
the time
would
comehe often thought of itwhen
they would be engraved in marble, and, suspended on
a mimic scroll, by the down-reaching arms of two
little fat cherubs, would proclaim to the world the
dignity of his dust.
Mynheer Van Corlear was third cousin to the great
patroon of Kenterhook, and annually, in the season
of the winter holidays, did that august personage pay
a visit to his city relations. It was in the latter part
of November, in the year 1689, that the household of
the alderman was thrown into commotion by the
receipt
of a letter from the patroon, announcing his
approach. He would set sail, thus the bulletin ran,
on the first of December, and expected with favoring
winds to arrive at the metropolis on or about the tenth
of the same month. He came thus early to avoid the
fatigues of a journey by land, as the advancing season
would soon close the river with ice; but it was none
too early for the protracted and convivial visits of
those hospitable days.
Great was the note of preparation at Van Corlear's,
for old General Van Ness was in truth a personage not
to be slighted. He was the proprietor of a princely
estate
on the banks of the Hudson, and his family mansion
had been a landmark for nearly half a century to the
navigators of that beautiful river. Wealthy almost
beyond competition in the province, he was also a
generous and benevolent old man, dispensing on every
side his bounteous charities, and making glad the
hearts of all who surrounded him. Like the latter
rain were his gifts, and like the dew of Hermon the
cheery smile with which he beheld and participated
in the happiness he bestowed. Many a poor neighbor
found his winter store of flour and meal at his door
upon opening it on a Christmas morning, with no other
clew to the donor than a feigned note from the merry
and ubiquitous saint of the season. At times, too, tied
in the mouth of the sack, like the rejected gold of
Joseph's brethren, a glittering guinea greeted the glad
eyes of the poverty-stricken laborer, who had passed
a sleepless night in harassing thoughts of quarter-day
at hand. The good old man's heart was indeed
unfitted
for selfish joy; nor was he willing to celebrate
with unmeaning merriment alone, the day which
commemorates
Heaven's highest mercy to mankind.
But the now anticipated visit of the patroon was to
be marked by an unusual feature, for his nephew and
prospective heir was to be his companion. For many
years a widower, and more recently rendered
childless
by the loss of his only son, his paternal affection
had been transferred to his sister's child, and Harry
Livingston was everywhere known as the future lord
of the vast domains of his uncle. He had but recently
returned from a sojourn of several years in England
and the Netherlands, where he had been sent for the
completion of an education then considered
unattainable
in the colonies. These opportunities, with the
additional advantages of travel, had not been lost
upon a mind naturally acute and discerning, and
sustained
moreover by a strong substratum of good sense,
and the young Livingston had returned to his native
land, a well-educated and accomplished man. It
need scarcely be said that he brought with him no
repulsive airs, and no affected contempt of provincial
life.
But while these distinguished travellers are darting
down the Hudson at the rate of fifteen miles in
sixteen
hours, and stopping nightly to avoid collision
with a vessel which was expected to pass up the river
during the same month, an opportunity will be
afforded
us to visit that mysterious household of the
alderman
,
to which allusion has been made. Please, then,
to drop into the
clairvoyant
state for a moment, gentle
reader, and you shall be speedily enlightened on this
subject. A few
passes
, if you pleasetherethus
a moment's steady gaze of the eyeand now I think
you are
en rapport
. And now, as the French
mesmerist
informed his gaping patient, I shall tell you
what you shall see; to which with easy acquiescence
you are expected to assent.
Endwise to the street standeth the dingy yellow
brick mansion of Burley Van Corlear, dated in front,
in iron letters built into the wall, 1666. Essentially
Dutch, from turret to foundation stone, its shape and
proportions have evidently been fashioned after some
fantastic old-world model, yet with a curious nicety
of detail which speaks plainer than words its builder's
faith in its being the very perfection of architecture.
With two wings and a tail-like appendage, it looks
not altogether unlike some huge bird which has
settled
heavily down upon the landscape, with ruffled
pinions projecting at many points, in the shape of
ill-hung
window blinds, of which the one half cannot be
opened, and the other half cannot be shut. An iron
weather-cock, somewhat opinionated on the subject
of the wind, and like its proprietor, not easily moved,
surmounts the summit of the building, and its walls
are decorated with little martin houses, to be let, rent
free, and already hospitably open for their expected
tenants. The out-buildings, arranged in the
heterogeneous
order, stand pointing at their principal from
every direction as if in amazement at the
extraordinary
spectacle, while an arched and open-mouthed
carriage house, on the side of the court, stares
ceaselessly
at it, with undisguised astonishment.
But it is less with the clumsy and ungainly casket
that we have to do, than with the jewels within.
And jewels, indeed, there were; to say nothing of
Burley himself, a precious old ruby, or of Vrow Van
Corlear, a very pearl in her way, albeit in
dimensions
one that would have made even a Shrewsbury
oyster stand agape. One more magnetic touch, one
gentle pass along the temples, (start not, fair reader!
those clustering curls shall not be harmed,) and these
richer gems shall become visible. Look now through
that open doorway which partly reveals the mysteries
of a half-acre kitchen, and tell me what you see. I do
not want to know about the mountain of freshly fried
cookies on the hearth, or the long row of pale and
unbaked
mince pies on the dresser, or the depth or
breadth of that Shadrach looking oven, glowing with
uncommon heat for their reception. But ratherah,
yesyou see her nowcrimping with white fingers
the edge of the forty-second pie, and turning around
with a face bewitching in its unconscious beauty, to
give a laughing word to a little crowing brother on
the floor. That round snowy arm, upraised in
playful
menace, those soft, blue, laughing eyes, those
glittering
teeth, revealed by chirrups, and that brown
glossy hair, scarce kept by force from curling, are
part and parcel all of sweet little Jessie Van Corlear.
The golden beams of the wintry sun, streaming
through the window, are bathing her beautiful form in
light, and casting moving shadows upon the floor,
thrice strange and wondrous to the little learner there.
But Jessie has another sunlight, emanating from
within
,
the perpetual product of a joyous and innocent
heart, gilding and permeating all things with its
beams.
She was made for happy thoughts,
For playful wit and laughter,
Singing on the hills alone,
And Echo singing after.
But what other vision, equally radiant and dazzling,
is this, which rises suddenly to our view? Queenly
is her gait, tall and Juno-like her figure, her eyes are
dark and flashing, her brow the home of Thought
while, flitting o'er her curling lip, steals that dread
bane of beauty, pride. An ornament and almost a
fixture
of the parlor, the pride and hope of the family,
the future bride, perhaps, of the heir of Kenterhook,
(for to such a height did the daring ambition of Burley
Van Corlear rise,) is the beautiful Gertrude. She has
by no means descended to the kitchen for the purpose
of assisting in its labors, nor is she expected so to do.
She has come, rather, to learn the progress of affairs.
Accustomed to deference, she must not be too highly
blamed, but there might, methinks, be a little more of
kindness in the tone of her voice as she addresses the
gentle Jessie, and, it may be fancy, but there seems
an air of chillness in her deportment as, rustling in
silks, and shining in antique jewelry, she returns
speedily to her apartment.
But the mystic fluid is failingthe room grows
darkthe building itself recedes, until with a
twinkling
motion of its last grotesque chimney, it vanishes
from view, followed by its whole group of satellites.
2*
CHAPTER II.
As the fowler spreads his snares for the unwary
bird, as the spider weaves his toils for the
unconscious
fly, so, saith tradition, did the belles of the
seventeenth
century entrap the harmless and
unsuspecting
beaux. But Fortune be thanked, that this cruel
fashion, if ever it existed, has passed away, and that
not a lady now, in all this broad land, pretends to
exercise
the art.
The commotion caused by the expected arrival of
the young patroon was far from being confined to the
family of Van Corlear. Many a plump Dutch maiden
in the neighborhood, and some even in the great city
adjacent, were calculating the chances against the
beautiful Gertrude, as they lingered, innocently enough,
at the labors of the toilet. None thought of Jessie,
nor did ever so treasonable an idea enter her guileless
breast as that of competition with the commanding
charms of her sister. She even looked forward with
delight to the expected triumph of Gertrude, albeit it
was a stinted measure of kindness which she might
ever expect from the future lady of Kenterhook. But
her good nature seemed, for once, to be fairly
reciprocated
.
Gertrude became suddenly very kind and
considerate toward her, and in the excess of her
solicitude
,
began even to discover symptoms of impaired
health in the bright blue eyes and ruby lips of her
sister
.
A little change of air, and a respite from
domestic
duties, was clearly requisite for so decided an
invalid
,
and inasmuch as old Aunt Schermerhorn, who
resided in the adjacent city, had long been
importuning
her for a visit, Gertrude advised that the
invitation
should at once be accepted. Doubting and
wondering
much, Jessie was still too ingenuous for
suspicion
,
and too much overjoyed at the prospect of the
proposed visit to analyze motives. Her parents'
permission
was accordingly obtained, and she was
posted
off without further ceremony. But while the
sagacious
Gertrude had taken such pains to get rid of
internal enemies, she found herself suddenly
subjected
to an unexpected attack from without. There
were in the immediate neighborhood of the Van
Corlears
,
three single sisters, not youthful, to whom some
mischievous wag had given the appellation of
the
fates
a name which, unfortunately for them, proved
as adhesive as diachylum. They were daughters of
old Baltus Van Dingle, a man half as rich as the
patroon
himself, and they now became suddenly
gracious
to Gertrude, and made her some long-deferred
visits, with many a condescending reason for their
delay. Not the least curiosity had they about the
expected guests, and when the subject was casually
mentioned, they were jointly and severally surprised
beyond all measure. The figures of two of these ladies
belonged to the style of beauty known as the squabby,
and their faces, round as a dumpling, had an
expression
not entirely dissimilar to that viand. The
youngestEve by namewas tall and not a little
lank, with very long and very yellow ringlets, which
were taught to twine, in many a golden convolution,
adown her neck. Her eyes were, in color, of an
unexceptionable
pea-green, but they were unfortunately
somewhat at variance, and her nasal organ, a little
upturned, seemed ever bent on learning the cause of
the difficulty. If, however, the visual organs of Miss
Eve were ill-arranged, she was favored with a
corresponding
mental obliquity which prevented her
from discovering the magnitude of the defect. One
eye, she argued to herself, was certainly true, and if
the other manifested a disposition to disclaim
companionship
with its fellow, the aberration was too
slight to attract attention. When it is further said
that Miss Van Dingle's brow was always a little
corrugated
,
probably by an ineffectual effort to keep the
refractory member in position, a more adequate
portraiture
of this lady will be presented. But there is
a wonderfully transforming power in the alembic of a
vivid imagination, and, by its aid, Eve had learned to
believe herself quite handsome, though certainly, as
she admitted to herself that very morning, while
unpinning
her sixteenth blazing curl at the mirror
certainly
of a different style of beauty from either of the
Misses Van Corlear. The exploring party tarried
long enough to glean the information for which
expressly
they had set out, and then took their leave
with some discouraging presentiments; but they had
long been taught the potency of gold, and possessing
so powerful an auxiliary, they did not altogether
despair.
Time rolled on. The little obstinate weather-cocks,
which had so long pointed pertinaciously to the south,
suddenly veered about, and a fresh northerly breeze
came sweeping down the river. On the wings of the
wind therefore, if not on the wings of love, came the
gallant young Livingston, all unconscious of the gins
and pitfalls which were set for his capture.
Overjoyed
was Burley Van Corlear, delighted was his worthy
spouse, and as glad as propriety would permit was
the more discreet Gertrude, at the arrival of the
guests. So boisterous in his merriment was the old
patroon, and so many were the alderman's words of
welcome, that both, in unison with the good dame,
poured forth a long, continuous, and commingled
stream of double and twisted words, to which none
made the least pretence of listening or reply.
But if there was an uproar of welcome within the
hospitable house, there was confusion worse
confounded
without. The well-packed wagon, which
had transported the guests from the city, where the
sloop had found moorings, was darkened by a cloud
of jabbering negroes of every age and size, making
the air ring with their merriment, as they clambered
upon the sides and wheels of the vehicle, and eagerly
assisted to discharge its contents. Of these, while the
greater part belonged to Van Corlear, a few had been
attracted by the commotion from the neighboring
farm-houses, and two, a little more staid and sober,
yet grinning broadly, were servants of the patroon,
rejoicing in the euphonious names of Josh and Squash.
These last were themselves the objects of no small
degree of admiration to their less favored brethren;
nor did the horses, well-fed and shining, which were
their especial care, fail to attract their share of
attention
,
for restive and champing, the noble steeds
manifested
their delight at regaining the use of faculties,
of which, on sloopboard, they had been so long
restrained
.
The travellers, it will be seen, had
judiciously
provided themselves with the means of
returning
home by land, if their more unstable highway
should become unnavigable before their visit was
brought to a close.
Great was the surprise of Livingston and Miss Van
Corlear on being introduced to each other; for
instead of the fat, dumpy, and peony-faced girl
of Harry's imagination, he met an elegant and
graceful lady, while she, anticipating the awkward
salute of a bashful youth, found herself confronted by
a gentleman, courtly, refined, and self-possessed.
It will be unnecessary to dwell at any length upon
the events of the few succeeding weeks. Miss Van
Corlear had a clear field, and it would have been
strange indeed, if, without a competitor, she could not
have gained the winning-post. Harry was a student,
fond of books, and fond of nature. Of human nature
he was not the best judge in the world, and least of
all, of that variety designated by bachelor Oldbuck as
woman-kind. He was a Dutchman, and rather
phlegmatic. But there was no resisting the
perpetual
recurrence of one beautiful face, the continuous
harmony of one gentle and melodious voice. His
books were gradually laid aside, his walks were
suspended
,
his favorite steed, unmounted, stood stamping
idly in the stable, turning his graceful neck, wistfully
and oft, to look for the master that came no more.
Sitting at Gertrude's side, and telling her tales of the
olden world, leaning over her harp as she warbled the
airs which
he
had taught her, reading aloud from her
favorite authors, these became now the more
prominent
features in Harry's daily life. The fountain of
his feelings had burst its icy surface, and like his
native
Hudson, released from its wintry chains,
revealed
a strong, deep, rapid current beneath. Harry was
in love. In vain did the Misses Van Dingle,
Goth-like
,
make a second irruption upon the Van Corlears.
The ancient family carriage, with its fat, glossy steeds,
and its grinning black driver, in vain proclaimed the
aristocratic rank of the dumpling faces and the long
yellow curls. Nature's aristocracy carried it clear,
against the broad acres of Van Dingle; and if the
visit of the fates had any effect, it was to enhance,
by contrast, the charms of Gertrude, and thus to hasten
the catastrophe which they would have averted.
Harry's fate was nearer at home. Christmas came
not, ere Gertrude Van Corlear, the cold, calculating,
ambitious Gertrude, was affianced to the young
patroon
as his future bride.
CHAPTER III.
The
Christmas Holidays, which brought home
every member of the family, never drew to paternal
doors a more frank, generous, whole-souled, and
sound-hearted
youth, than Seth Van Corlear. Freshly
released from academic restraint, he came bounding
into the house like a fire-ball, his round red face
blazing
with excitement, and his large blue eyes sparkling
with joy. Staying for but hasty salutations, he danced
off with a little Van Corlear in each hand, to see the
horses, the cows, the pigs and the poultry, and as if he
had but one minute's vacation instead of three weeks,
was back again in a twinkling, dashing through every
room in the house, catching hold of everybody, and
finally coming to a stand, only to shout long and
loudly for Jessie. Great was his surprise and grief to
learn that his favorite sister was absent at such a time.
Although himself within his minority, he was still two
years the senior of Jessie, and considered himself in
some degree the guardian of her interests, as he had
been in boyhood her champion and defender. If his
affection for her was ever full and overflowing, it was
perhaps owing partly to the fact that its channel in
another direction had been long since obstructed.
His monitor, his task mistress, the informant against
his boyish peccadilloesthese were the unfavorable
lights in which Memory ever placed his elder sister,
and there had been but little in the deportment of her
later years to regain the fraternal affection which had
been so early estranged. That she had been in some
way the cause of Jessie's absence, was a suspicion
which at once forced itself upon his mind with all the
strength of conviction. Bitter and burning, therefore,
was his shame for Gertrude, but more bitter and more
burning was his indignation. His dear, his gentle, his
pretty Jessie, whom, in sportive mood, he had so often
styled the future bride of Kenterhook, had been
spirited
away by a jealous sister, at the very moment
when all his brilliant visions in her behalf might have
been realized. And might they not yet? Learning
for the first time to dissemble his thoughts and
feelings
,
he became a vigilant observer of Livingston and
Gertrude. But there was as yet no openly avowed
engagement of the lovers, and there was but little to
mark the intimate nature of their relation. Seth,
indeed
,
saw nothing. In ecstacies with the belief that
all was yet safe, he took every occasion adroitly and
with seeming inadvertence to sound the praises of his
absent favorite, and within a few days gained the
parental permission to terminate her exile.
Flitting across the crackling snow, behind two
noble
steeds, whose hot breath smokes upon the air,
behold him now hastening to the city, his merry
sleigh-bells chiming with the music of his sanguine
heart. Hark to that last emphatic crack of his
whip, as dashing gallantly up, he stops suddenly at
old Aunt Schermerhorn's well remembered door; and
see where, bounding down the steps, across the
side-walk
,
and into the very sleigh, Jessie throws her arms
about his neck, her warm curls brushing his
frosted
cheek, while the frighted steeds start and stand
trembling at a sound that minds them of the falling
thong. Short was the visit of the restless youth. In
a few brief hours, with Jessie at his side, cloaked and
muffed and tippeted well nigh to suffocation, he was
starting for home, under a perfect shower of
prudential
admonitions from a spare, spectacled old dame at
the door, who foresaw a whole catalogue of accidents
in a two miles drive across the snow. Not a whisper,
however, did he breathe into his sister's ear on the
subject which lay so near his heart. He descanted,
indeed, upon the many merits of Livingston, and
described
his person and his manners, and when his
laughing listener, utterly thoughtless of self, hinted
her suspicions, and indeed her hopes, in regard to
Gertrude
and her guest, Seth did not hesitate to scout the
idea as entirely unfounded. Not a little astonished at
this, Jessie became perhaps a shade more thoughtful
during the remaining part of their ride; but she
would not own to herself, and she would have died at
the stake before she would have confessed to another,
the thoughts which had thus been forced upon her
mind. Her brother's conduct, his praises of
Livingston
,
his decrial of Gertrude, she now understood
them all, and her heart fluttered until she feared that
Seth would hear its pulsations. Cordial indeed was
her reception at home, and from no one more so, than
from the good old patroon, who chided her roundly
for her prolonged absence. As for Livingston, in
every word, in every look did he betray his
admiration
of the beautiful little fairy. It is true that he
looked upon her as a sister, but there was a natural
empressement
in his manner when addressing a lady,
of which he was unaware. Although his engagement
to Gertrude was unknown in the family, he never for
a moment doubted that she had confided the secret to
her sister. But Gertrude had no confidants, and, ever
selfish and unfeeling, she either did not notice Jessie's
danger, or noticed it only to count on her own
approaching
triumph. As the good-natured but
blundering
zeal of Seth had originated, so did it continue
to foster an error which daily became more
portentous
.
But let us not dwell upon the painful
particulars
that mark the yielding up of fresh, pure, generous
affections, in response to the misunderstood kindness
of a heart equally noble and equally pure.
Christmas came, and a merry Christmas it was. It
was cold without, and the snow lay deep upon the
ground, and a million of feathery flakes were
sporting
leisurely in the air, whether falling or rising the
eye could scarcely tell. It was cold without, but the
Christmas fire, built at dawn, was blazing cheerily
within, where, deposited deep in the capacious
chimney
,
a section of a centennial oak upheld the glowing,
crackling, roaring pile. The little folks, half clad, or
with their garments tucked beneath their arms, were
rushing gleefully from their rooms to gain their
plethoric
stockings, and gloat over the now disgorged
treasures
,
which had floated, night-long, before their
imaginations
,
with all the flitting colors of the
kaleidoscope
.
And firmly faithful in their invisible friend, the
good, old, undying Santa Claus, they were next seen
eagerly searching for his traces on the chimney side, or
rushing, with a shout, to see the foot-prints of his tiny
steeds upon the roof, which, alas, the falling snow had
already effaced. Nor were they alone happy. Joy
sat on every countenance, and the Merry Christmas
salutation rang from every quarter, as the family,
assembled early in the breakfast-room, discussed the
past, or planned approaching festivities. There,
towering
on the old misshapen sideboard, rose the huge
pile of cakes, embossed with strange devices, awaiting
the calls of troops of rosy-cheeked children from
abroad. There was a jingling, too, of many sixpences
in the capacious pockets of the patroon, who looked
eagerly and often from the windows, and wondered
why the little rogues did not come. He had not long,
however, to wait, for the first detachment of light
infantry, as he loved to call them, was early on its
way. Ploughing, knee-deep, through the snow, their
wild laughter ringing through the clear cold air, as
each strove to be foremost, bursting headlong into
the house, with blazing cheeks and frosted locks
and large sparkling eyes, thus did they come, a
blithesome and a joyous band; and soon, laden with
their anticipated gifts, hastened away to storm
some other citadel, equally well prepared for the
expected attack.
The holidays were marked, as usual, by a joyous
round of wintry amusements. At the top and the
bottom, and in the midst of every scheme of
merriment
and fun, the life of every party, and the favorite
of all, save one, was Seth. But brief was his dream
of delight. The delusion into which he had run, and
which he had imparted to his ingenuous sister, could
not, fortunately, be of long continuance. Words may
not paint the deep mortification of Jessie, her self
reproach, her bitter, burning grief, when the fatal truth
became apparent. Duplicity, she knew, formed no
part of Livingston's character, and she readily
perceived
the mistake under which he had acted. But if
her anguish was at first severe, it was in no small
degree
alleviated by the belief, nay the certainty, that
he had never suspected her sentiments. This
conviction
,
indeed, was the removal of a mountain-like
weight from her mind. She was spared that last
dreadful blow to a sensitive and modest maiden, the
consciousness that one who loved her not, knew
himself
to be the object of her regard. But Jessie did not
pine. Every sentiment of duty, and of self-respect,
bade her forget her transient error, and conceal its
traces from others. Seth alone suspected the truth
and although his very efforts to seem unconscious of it,
betrayed his thoughts to his sister, what did she care
for dear kind Seth? Not from him would she have
feared censure or doubt, had she been as deserving of
these as she was of the smiles of Heaven, which even
then, through the clouds that enveloped her, were
resting
upon her guileless heart.
And what during all this time were the thoughts
3
and feelings of Gertrude. Still selfish, proud, and
aspiring, suspicious of Jessie, scornful to Seth, and but
simulating a regard for him whose love for her was
only less than adoration, Gertrude Van Corlear was
prepared to plight, before the altar of Truth, a false
and perjured faith. Ah! it is a sad thing to behold a
bright and beautiful spirit, severing the golden links
that connect it with Infinite Beneficence, and
descending
by the acquired gravity of earthly passions, from
even the slight moral elevation of poor human nature.
But the time for the departure of the guests drew
nigh, and the betrothal of Harry and Gertrude was
at length openly avowed. It met with the full
approbation
of parents and uncles, and the cause was duly
set down in Hymen's calendar for the ensuing May,
the intervening time being considered requisite for the
bride elect to make her multitudinous arrangements.
Ever cheerful, the old patroon was in ecstasies at a
result which he had long secretly anticipated; he had
a good word for all, and to the delighted children he
promised another round of holidays in the spring.
As for our pretty bridesmaid, said the garrulous
old man, seizing the slightly tremulous and wax-like
hand of Jessie, the next ship shall carry orders for
a dress of pearly satin for her, that a princess might
be proud to wear. Hurried thanks, and a sunny
smile, rewarded the old man's kindness, but whiter
than the promised robe turned Jessie.
Harry and Seth had formed an intimacy which
promised perpetuity, and had spent many a merry
hour together in the woodland, scouring over brake,
bush and brier, in pursuit of the game, which then
abounded in regions that are now well nigh central
of the great metropolis. Seth had meanwhile found
many an opportunity to recount the merits of his pet,
but maintained a pertinacious silence whenever the
young patroon hinted at the more magnificent charms
of her sister. The young friends parted with regret,
but with the anticipation of many a merry day's sport
together in the forests of Kenterhook. Yet pleasing
as were those hopes, there was nothing that could
compensate Seth for his bitter disappointment. He
knew the ungentle temper of his elder sister too well
to expect anything like happiness for his friend from
the anticipated union, and he grieved alike for Harry,
for Jessie, and for himself. Why was it, he vainly
asked, as the departing guests faded from his sight,
why was it, when the elements of happiness might
have been so easily mingled for each, that the bitter
and brimming cup of grief was to be substituted in
its stead?
The vessel in which the visitors had journeyed to
the city had, of course, long since returned, and the
river was closed with ice. They returned in the
family carriage which they had brought with them,
taking advantage of the January thaw for that
purpose
,
which then, as now, occurred with sufficient
uniformity to be a matter of almost accurate
calculation
.
CHAPTER IV.
The
imperious Gertrude, relieved from the restraint
imposed by the immediate presence of Livingston, no
longer set limits to her pride. Her sister had daily
to bear some new variety of contumely, and as for
poor Seth, his would have been a slight discernment
indeed, if he had not read in every glance that
encountered
him from the bride elect, the simple mental
element of contempt. In vain did his generous spirit
fret and chafe to contemplate the sumptuous
preparations
which were making for the approaching nuptials.
In vain did he quarrel with Jessie for lending so
willing
a hand in furtherance of a match, which,
wherever
it may have originated, he stoutly contended was
never made in Heaven. Old Burley meanwhile
groaned under the daily exactions levied upon his
purse, but consoled himself for his diminishing
guilders
,
by the rising honors of his family.
Donner and blitzen, Getty! would the old man
exclaim, his looks really expressing the last degree of
alarm, her you come again for money?
But Getty condescended to no explanations; but
with the slightest perceptible smile, and not the
slightest
curl of a scornful lip, replied only that she
must
have it. And have it she did, no matter what
denials
or privations it occasioned the less distinguished
members of the family. The alderman's purse was,
indeed, none of the longest, and he began to look
forward with some anxiety to the time when he
should get so expensive a piece of property off his
hands.
But Spring, beauteous Spring, began to give token
of her approach. The venturous red-breast was her
earliest herald; the tiny blue-bird soon followed in
its path; the swallow began to caracole through the
air; and the little daisy, wakened, perhaps, by their
voices, peeped timidly from the earth. Coquettish
April came, like her fickler type, dispensing
alternating
smiles and frowns, now making bright skies the
prelude to a storm, now threatening wrathful gusts,
only to burst forth in sunlight, or dissolve in tears.
Thirty days later from Albany, were the
eye-catching
words, paraded at column-head of a digny,
diminutive newspaper, issued at this period; and
following
this startling announcement was a long account
of an overland express, two months from Oswego,
through the Genesee country, and giving tidings of the
pending troubles with the French. But the vessel
which brought this important intelligence, and which
now lay at the wharf, thronged by the curious, was the
bearer also of despatches from Kenterhook, where it
had put in for provisions and repairs. The great
family seal of General Van Ness was easily
recognized
upon the neat-looking packet which was put
into Burley's hands, addressed to Ye Honorable
Burleigh
Van Corlear, whilom Alderman of New York.
Reet it again, said the old man, as Seth
announced
the pompous superscription.
Seth gravely repeated the address.
Dat ish very goot, said Burley, lowering his
pipe, after a moment's reflection; dush he say
anything
elsh?
Seth proceeded to open the missive, and found
something else within decidedly more to the point,
that is to say, that the great patroon and his nephew
were about to embark for the city, and were to be
looked for from the first to the fifteenth of May
inclusive
.
But the letter also told of the serious
indisposition
of the general, and that he would not venture
upon the voyage but for the advantage afforded by
the vicinity of the city in procuring medical advice.
This was really afflicting news to Van Corlear and
his kind-hearted vrow, the latter of whom, however,
warranted that she could cure him. The poor
old man, she said, knew nothing about coddling
himself
;
the doctors might be hanged, as she had known
more than one to be in her day, and she began to
enumerate a list of herbs on hand, of which one
would be certain to cure him, if another failed,
although, to be sure, she did not yet know whether
his disease was the gout, the measles, or St. Vitus's
dance. But the letter proceeded to say that the
patroon desired the wedding to take place as soon
after his arrival as possible, for he thought,
benevolent
old man, that the very sight of so much joy
would infuse new life into his veins.
They came. It was on one of the brightest
mornings
in May that the manly and noble-looking
Livingston
might have been seen, with earnest solicitude,
assisting his feeble relative to alight from a carriage
at Van Corlear's door. No noisy salutations now
welcomed
his approach. The family, indeed, thronged
to the carriage, anxious to learn how much to hope
or fear in his behalf; but he who had seen the good
dame rush smilingly out, and catching a distant
glimpse of the invalid's face, stop midway, and return
silently to the house, with her apron at her eyes,
would have needed little other information than that
simple gesture. But if his friends looked sad, the
patroon himself was still merry. His unfavorable
appearance, indeed, was partly owing to the fatigues
of travel, and after a little rest, and some of the good
vrow's doses, and the still better medicine for him,
of smiling faces and cheerful words on every side,
he began to exhibit a returning vitality that gave
promise of better things. The carriage, which had
approached the door with a slow and hearse-like
motion, was immediately seen dashing away at a
fearful speed, for Seth was within, despatched
express
by Livingston for the city's most eminent
physician. Nor was Doctor Schwackhammer tardy
3*
in obeying the summons to the bedside of the
distinguished
patient, who had travelled so far to obtain
the benefit of his advice. He was an old practitioner,
to whom half of the existing population of the island
had been indebted for assistance at quite too early a
period of their lives to admit of their appreciating
the favor, and to whom many of their cotemporaries
were under
unspeakable
obligations for a somewhat
hasty exodus from this troublesome world. The
doctor was older even than the patroon, and he
consequently saw no evidence of natural decay in
his patient. There was no breaking up of the
constitution
,
not a bit of it. There was a little of one
disease, and a slight touch of another, and some
symptoms of a third, but altogether the eminent
physician thought he would be a great deal better
on the next day, provided he had a good night's rest,
and had no bad turns. And so he was. The hushed
voices of the children were changed, on the morrow,
to gleeful tones, and merriment was again the order
of the day. The wedding was now in every mouth,
and was arranged for the first of the ensuing week.
Harry Livingston was a happy man. His own
heart was full of all noble emotions, and he easily
discovered the same qualities in one to whom they
were as foreign as flowers to the iceberg. There
was indeed a winning beauty in the expression of
Gertrude's soft, dark eyes, as they rested upon her
fascinated lover, and a thrush-like melody in the tone
of her voice, although one might have taken many a
safer wager, than that she was not at those very
moments calculating how soon it would be prudent
to broach the subject of a fashionable house in town.
You will surely return with us, said Livingston,
addressing Jessie, and aid to cheer up our poor
uncle. The magnificent scenery of the river, of
which you have so often heard, ought, of itself, to be
a sufficient inducement.
Jessie hesitated to reply, but the considerate
Gertrude
came to her relief. I fear that dear sister,
she said, can hardly be spared from home; it would
be indeed cruel to leave our kind parents to the
tender
mercies of Seth, and the other children.
Let Seth also go with us, rejoined Harry; he
will find abundance of game in our forests, of every
variety; even deer and moose are not scarce.
Seth's vagrant propensities are already
sufficiently
developed, I fear, was Gertrude's reply,
and need no such encouragement; besides which,
he will certainly be needed at home.
Seth heard this conversation, and for once his ready
smile took somewhat of a hyenal cast. His spirits
had gone up to fever heat on the mention of the deer
and moose, and had sunk as suddenly to zero, under
the cold-water treatment of his sister. But he was
not quick at repartee, and he quietly swallowed the
affront, for the amiable Gertrude had taught him to
perform some remarkable feats in that kind of
deglutition
.
Livingston continued to urge his wishes in
regard to Jessie, confident that her society would be
invaluable to his uncle; but the subject was postponed
for future consideration.
The great day came. The patroon's continued
illness
had in some measure frustrated the design of
having a large party; but there were such quantities
of good things prepared to be eaten and drunk, and
carried away, that it was absolutely necessary to have
somebody come. There were some relations, too,
whom it would not do to slight. A few were
therefore
invited from fear and a few from affection. The
Van Dingles were asked out of spite. They came,
too, from the same laudable motive, for if anybody
could pick flaws, and make surmises, and hint dark
inuendos of shadowy suspicions, it was the fates.
The bride might look to her dress, for if there was a
crease in the flowing satin, the world would know it.
But Gertrude was above criticism both in person and
apparel, and that she herself was not unconscious of
this fact her deportment very plainly proclaimed.
Jessie, too, who had donned the magnificent robe
which the patroon, mindful of his promise, had
presented
to her, Jessie was faultless in her beauty. Not
lynx-eyed malice itself could have whispered aught
against the perfect charms of the little Houri. The
budding moss-rose, the daisy, the dew-drop, the
sunbeam
,
all things bright and beautiful in nature, were
emblems of Jessie. So at least thought Harmon Van
Dingle, a wilted bachelor brother of the fates, who,
his own word for it, had been turned of thirty
any time within the last fifteen years, and who had
begun seriously to contemplate the idea of sharing his
future patrimony with the pretty bridesmaid.
Everybody
knows that Cupid follows in the train of Hymen
to select new victims. Ill-natured people might say,
indeed, that part of his errand is to reclaim the darts
which he had implanted in the breasts of the married
pair, and for which they would have no further use.
At any rate, the little archer was present on this
occasion
,
fully equipped, and his shafts flew in more
directions
than one; for the youngest Miss Van Dingle was
observed to gaze tenderly and oft at the ruddy cheeks
of Seth, who was unfortunately too busily engaged in
looking daggers at a costly necklace of the bride
elect, to observe his conquest. For Gertrude was
already present. There was no parade of an
imposing
entre
of the bridal party, with the rustling of silks
and a gale of perfumery. Quietly awaiting the
arrival
of the clergyman, who made it a point of dignity
to be a few minutes behind his time, the family and
visitors were seated about the room, chatting as yet
with a little restraint. In a large easy chair, eligibly
posted to command a view of the ceremony, sat the
patroon. He was wan of face, but his bright
beaming
eye seemed to give token of returning health. If
there had been any limit to his stock of smiles and
good wishes, they would have been long ago
expended
;
but the fountain was inexhaustible, and poured
forth its generous streams as freshly as ever. His
eyes rested frequently with a patriarchal expression
upon Harry and Gertrude, but occasionally strayed
past them, through an open window beyond, and
onward
to the cloudless skies. There were noiseless
motions, too, of his lips, and a calm assurance on his
face, which spoke of hopes and communings far away
from earth.
The clergyman was at length announced, and
reannounced
,
alas, in the sudden pallor of poor Jessie's
face. Giddy and faint, her heart flutters and stands
still, and starts again with a labored and violent
motion. One eye only observes her distress, and
turns hastily away. Ah, unhappy Seth! these are
thy doings. But she soon became calm, the color
returned
to her cheeks, and she faltered no more. There
was a little further delay, and then the clergyman
arose, and the bride and the groom, and Seth and
Jessie at their side, and a silence deep and breathless
prevailed. Deep and breathless, and broken only by
the chirp of the swallow, as he darted past the open
window, and the hum of the noisy bee, loitering
among the flowering vines on the porch. But at this
moment, a faint scream issued from the lips of Jessie,
and darting past the priest, she knelt at the old
patroon's
chair, and caught his hand within her own.
His head had dropped upon his chest, his eyes were
quietly closed, and his spirit was in Heaven.
CHAPTER V.
May
had passed away, with her early flowers, and
June began to tinge with a deeper green the forests
and the fields. The blossoms of Spring had fallen,
and the reddening cheeks of the cherries, those first
rich fruits of the year, told that the warm breath of
Summer was playing among the trees. All things
were as blithe and beautiful without, as if the wings
of the angel of Death had never overshadowed the
land, or rather, as if the spirits of the good departed
from their earthly frames, only to diffuse themselves
among the birds, the sunlight, and the flowers. In a
small but handsomely furnished room in the mansion
of the late General Van Ness, gazing through an open
window at the beautiful scenery without, sat Seth Van
Corlear. Before him, around him, and on every side,
were books; shelves lined with books, extended half
way around the room, and books, maps, and papers
lay strewn about the floor. Seth was usually but little
fond of retirement, and seemed scarcely at home,
seated
thus in the study of Livingston, at whose request
he had gone to Kenterhook to take a general
superintendence
of affairs during the absence of its new
proprietor
.
The heir, who had been so suddenly
transformed
from a dependent to a millionaire, had resolved
not to return to his estates until the ensuing autumn,
when the nuptials, which had been so sadly broken
off, were to be celebrated, and he might bring back
smiles and joy to his now desolate house. The family
vault of the Van Nesses was in the city of New York,
and there the remains of the late patroon had been
deposited. He had left no will, because without it,
the law itself devolved his large property upon his
nephew, who was his only near relation.
Seth spent a portion of his time in visiting some of
the nearer tenantry, and occasionally making an
excursion
into the interior to call some remote
delinquent
to account. Of amusement he was in no lack,
for the forests on every side were alive with game,
and the antlers of many a noble stag, posted
conspicuously
about the room, proclaimed his prowess in the
chase. But latterly he had seemed more disposed to
quietude and reflection, and he would sit for hours in
the study, gazing out of the window, with an
unheeded
book open before him, and with a sad and
half-angry expression upon his face. But Seth's eyes
no longer rest upon the distant river, nor on the more
distant hills, nor on the high-piled snowy clouds
floating
buoyantly above them. He is looking now upon
eyes that seem to return his gaze, from within a large
gilded frame on the opposite side of the room. It is
a portrait of the late patroon, and at its side, in smaller
compass, is a likeness, also, of the blooming lad of
fourteen, who ten years before had left the paternal
roof, never to return. He had been sent abroad, as
Livingston subsequently was, for the completion of
his education, and after four years of absence, had
embarked
for home in a vessel which was soon after
totally wrecked. The particulars of his fate were not
known by his relations, for although the late patroon
was supposed to have had minute information of all
the facts, the subject was one, doubtless by reason of
its exceedingly painful interest, on which he seldom
spoke.
Long and thoughtfully did Seth gaze at the
pictures
;
frowns gathered upon his brow, and smiles
succeeded, and his bright blue eyes now flashed with
merriment, and now grew serious in doubt. Anon he
started suddenly from his chair and rapidly traversed
the room, uttering disjointed sentences, and
occasionally
stopping before the portraits and looking up as if
he expected a reply. More boisterous still became
Seth. His red face grew redder, he walked the room
more rapidly, he rubbed his large hands together, and
finally brought one of them down upon his leg with a
slap that made the very windows tremble. He next
proceeded deliberately to take the dimensions of the
smaller frame, and having committed them to writing,
he left the house. When he next returned to the
study, he brought with him a shallow wooden case,
opening with hinges, and secured with a lock and
key. In this he carefully deposited the portrait of the
lad, locked it, pocketed the key, and again sat down
to reflect. On the next day, he announced to the
surprised
domestics, that he was about leaving home, for
an absence of ten or twelve days; and many a secret
conclave was held among the sable gentry to discuss
his destination. They could make nothing of it,
however
,
excepting that he must be going clear up to the
great city of Albany, a place which, although less
than thirty miles distant, was to the oldest of them an
object of faith rather than of sight. The best horses and
the best wagon were, however, prepared with great
alacrity for the momentous expedition, and old Aunt
Dinah, fearful of famine by the way, made her
appearance
at the moment of starting, laden with a large
and snugly packed basket of provisions. It's ony a
bite, she gravely replied to Seth's remonstrances,
meaning thereby, as appeared on future inspection,
three several hams, half a score of mince pies, and
cakes untold. Seth had succeeded in transferring his
mysterious looking box to the wagon without
observation
,
and had secured the study from any intrusion
during
his absence, lest the portrait should be missed.
Whistling and singing, chirruping to the horses, and
occasionally
shouting to fright some distant crow from his
perch, or scare the scampering squirrel to its nest, he
dashed merrily along through the still and echoing
forest. His course was northward, and his immediate
destination, as had been rightly conjectured, was
Albany
.
In this venerable Dutch city resided several
families distantly connected with the late patroon,
whom he did not hesitate to visit. That he was a
Van Corlear, was a sufficient introduction for him
everywhere among the friendly mynheers; but Seth
was not disposed to trespass long upon the hospitalities
of any. In vain did the buxom maidens dart their sly
glances at his sunny face, and vainly did their more
worldly mothers hint at munificent dowries, with the
brindled cow thrown in. Seth was proof against all
such gentle blandishments. His chief attention, on the
contrary, seemed given to the grown-up sons of the
family
.
With these he took pains to win favor, and while
he praised the horses and the sweet-hearts which
divided
their affection, he looked narrowly into their faces,
and watched closely their deportment. From these
interviews, he would go directly to his wagon, unlock
his carefully concealed casket, and gaze long and
earnestly
at the treasure within. Thus did he visit and
inspect all the families in the city, who claimed any
consanguinity, however remote, with the late patroon,
but from his last examination, as from his first, he
turned away with a saddened and disappointed air.
Coarse features and coarser frames, white heads, thick
necks and bandy legsthese were among the pleasing
reminiscences of his new-found friends, which floated
continually before his mind. He had not yet learned
that remarkable physiological fact, that in the Dutch
races, the family beauty and grace, like the family
plate, all descend in the female line. But on more
minute inquiry, he heard that there was still another
family, bearing the name of Van Ness, living far up
toward the Champlain country, which last named
region was then generally supposed to be the
territory
lying immediately around the North Pole. Their
place of residence was some twenty miles north of
the ancient town of Schagticoke, a name which,
however
barbarous to the outside Yankees, is dear to
many a Dutch ear. The polar Van Ness, too, was said
to be a very near relation of the late general, their
fathers having been first cousins.
Nothing daunted by the magnitude of the journey,
young Van Corlear bade his Albanian friends farewell,
and without informing them of his course, crossed to
the eastern side of the river, and struck out boldly
into the northern wilderness. His winding road, but
half redeemed from the surrounding wilds, led through
primeval forests dark and tangled, where now,
rivalling
the modern capital, and a very thorn in her side,
stands the beauteous city of Troy, well worthy of her
classic name, and where long Lansingburgh
out-stretched
,
adorns the river's side. Opposite to Half
Moon Point, he paused awhile to witness the
confluence
of the mighty Mohawk with its northern sister,
and to meditate upon the unrevealed mysteries of that
far western world, through which its silvery tide had
rolled. With what an air of life and freshness did it
come, that bright and sparkling flood, alive with the
impetus of its leap at the cataract of the Cahoes, and
singing its wild song of freedom, and its lays of forest
chivalry and love. There were curling columns of
smoke that told of wigwam life upon the point,
which overlooked those mighty rivers, where now a
dreamy spell-bound town exists, like some enchanted
city of the Past, where men grow gray in the
simplicity
of childhood, and are disbelievers in the
progress
of the age.
Omitting a record of the perils which beset the
solitary traveller, let us see him next, again a welcome
guest in a hospitable family, of which, until the
preceding
day, he had never so much as heard. His
hopes, whatever they were, revived as he beheld the
multitudinous progeny that surrounded the hearth
aye, the house, and the barn, for that matterof
Bartholomew
Jacobus Van Ness. As before, however,
his attention was chiefly bestowed upon the young
men of the family, of whom there were not a few,
and more and more did his spirits rise, as he conversed
severally with these, and still made his mysterious
visits to his concealed picture. But he learned, on
inquiry, that there was yet one whom he had not seen.
This was Derick, the eldest of the sons, who was
absent
on a hunting excursion; and Seth, having inquired
the direction he had taken, immediately set out in
pursuit
.
He was not long in coming up with the
sportsman
,
the very first glance of whom made his merry
eyes sparkle with delight. He was tall, well-formed,
and graceful in his deportment, presenting a striking
contrast to his obese and awkward cousins. But on
a sufficiently near approach to look into the
countenance
of the young Van Ness, Seth's ecstasy no
longer knew any bounds. His smiles deepened into
a grin, as he first stared silently in the stranger's face
4
and then proceeded to dance around him and inspect
him on every side. Derick gazed with a droll and
puzzled look at his visiter, who, still completely
abstracted
,
was coolly proceeding to examine him next
by the sense of feeling, but a significant gesture of the
other partly recalled him to his senses.
Never mind, said Seth, apologetically, it's all
the same,
you'll do;
which last two words he
continued
slowly to repeat at intervals of a few seconds,
while reperusing the features of his companion.
Never doubting that he was dealing with a madman,
Derick stood a little upon his guard, and returned the
other gaze for gaze. But when Van Corlear's
excitement
had partly subsided, he politely apologized for
his rudeness, and having cordially shaken hands with
the huntsman, they were in a few minutes seated
together
at the foot of a huge tree, engaged in earnest
conversation. Whatever may have been the subject
under discussion, it was evidently one which pleased
them both mightily. Seth, however, now kept
himself
under restraint, although his body seemed to have
parted with all its natural gravity. Like the pith-ball
witches of children, held forcibly upon the wrong
end, he seemed continually about to bound upward
and turn a somerset. His nervous grasp upon a
projecting
root of the tree favored this supposition, and
conveyed the idea that he was holding himself down.
Derick was about twenty-five years of age, jovial to
an excess, and fond of every variety of adventure.
His inner man was but little indebted to education,
but he was quick-witted, had good natural parts, and
a head that was never hazy. When their forest
conference
was ended, they returned immediately
homeward
,
and went privately to the wagon of Van Corlear,
where the latter unlocked his box and displayed its
contents to his companion. Much did they marvel
and chuckle, but at what more particularly, tradition
doth not say.
On the next morning, after another long and secret
conference with Derick, Seth bade his hospitable
friends adieu, and started for home, where he safely
arrived on the third day, having made the most
formidable
inroads by the way upon Aunt Dinah's store
of provisions, to the no small delight of the
good-natured
slave.
CHAPTER VI.
It
was about six weeks subsequent to the occurrence
of the events last related that a gentleman with a
decidedly
foreign air, and wearing a heavy
moustache
,
called at the mansion of the patroon, and inquired for
General Van Ness. He seemed greatly afflicted on
hearing of his death, and dismounting from the jaded
steed which had evidently borne him no small
distance
,
demanded to know who was in possession of
the house. He was surrounded, by this time, by a
circle of awe-stricken negroes, whose huge platter
eyes were distended to the last extent, while a brood
of monkey-like children were peering through the
interstices, looking, if possible, still more astonished
and alarmed. The hoarse croak of old Jake at length
found utterance sufficient to reply, in behalf of the
company, that they didn't any of them know anything
there, but that Massa Seth was in yender and could
tell the gemman everything.
And who the dl, said the fierce-looking
foreigner
,
forgetting his grief, and frightening his whole
auditory a step or two backward, who the dl is
Massa Seth? Is there no one here to welcome
Bleecker Van Ness back to his father's house, after
ten long years of absence?
Old Jake, on hearing this adjuration, ran up and
gave one eager gaze into the stranger's face, and then
stood mouthing horribly at him, without voice, while
every joint in his old palsied frame shook with
agitation
;
Aunt Dinah performed a feat never before
recorded
of any of her raceshe fainted outright, and
fell like a feather-bed upon the ground; while the rest
of the troop ran pell-mell in every direction, some
shouting,
A spook!
and others that the day of
judgment
had come.
Attracted by the turmoil, Seth made his appearance
first at the window, and then descended into the court,
where, having hastily reproved the slaves, who had
rallied in the distance, he turned courteously to the
stranger, and inquired the cause of the alarm. The
latter at once assumed a more lofty air, and glancing
at the servants who were again clustering around him.
replied that their affright could scarcely be considered
a matter of surprise. I, he continued, am Bleecker
Van Ness, the only son and rightful heir of the late
patroon of Kenterhook. How long shall I stand, sir,
surrounded by menials, awaiting a stranger's
invitation
to enter my own doors?
Hurriedly apologizing by saying that astonishment
had held him speechlessfor very much amazed was
Sethhe immediately led the way into his study,
which both having entered, he locked and
double-locked
the door; but conscious that the listening
negroes were already piled three tiers deep on the
outside, he at once conducted the stranger across the
room into an adjoining bed-room. The door of this
apartment he also hastily closed, and then turned
upon his visiter a face bearing the marks of the last
stages of suffocation.
You'll do
, he said,
you'll do
, chuckling and
choking as he grasped the hand of the other, and
then, throwing himself upon the bed, he buried his
face in the pillow, and shook like a stranded grampus.
Don't you think I'm rather too dark? said the
stranger, looking in the mirror at his sun-burnt
features
.
By no means, replied Seth; why, man, haven't
you been six years a prisoner in Algiers?
Oh, aye, I forgot thatso I haveand deuced hot
work it was, too, toiling on the quays under that
broiling
sun.
Of course it was, said Seth.
The two friends now sat down for further
conference
and consultation, and for many days succeeding,
they were busily engaged together, at times poring
over maps and charts, and at times perusing books of
travels. The stranger proved an apt scholar, and
with Seth's aid, soon acquired a valuable addition to
his stock of useful knowledge. The delighted slaves
readily recognized him as their young master, and he,
in turn, remembered them all, not excepting some
youngsters of nine or ten years.
The new patroon did not, however, deem it
prudent
to make any very extensive draughts as yet upon
the allegiance of his surrounding tenantry. His
modesty
indeed extended so far, that he even denied
himself
for the present to the few visiters whom the
rumor of his unexpected advent attracted to his house.
But in the presence of Seth and the domestics he was
more pretending, and seemed desirous of practising
some of those airs of authority and station which his
future dignities might require him to exhibit, and
which would indicate to the observer that he had
been to the
manor
born.
Look at dat now, exclaimed the sable Josh, half
surlily, and half in admiration, as booted and spurred,
and flourishing a fanciful riding-whip, his young
master made his appearance, and after much scolding
at the imperfect grooming of his horse, (or rather of
Livingston's choicest steed,) mounted and rode
dashingly
offjes look at dathe aint rubbed down, aint
he? and he shining like beeswax all over. But golly
gosh! continued the negro after a pause, with his
eyes fixed wonderingly on the flying steed, how
Massa Bleecker
do
ridehow stiddy he setsee him
go, Quashcross de bridgeover de creektroo de
groveby jingo! Massa Harry no ride like dat, any
how; yhah! yhah! yhah! and an echoing plaudit
arose from the whole sable fraternity.
That is really a very respectable sort of an
animal
,
exclaimed the new patroon when, after an
hour's absence, he had returned at the same rapid
pace, and dismounted among the officious slaves,
where Seth also chanced to be present; quite
respectable
for this new country, but you should mount
a real Barbary once, Mr. Van Corlear, to know what
riding isa coal-black Barbary, with head erect and
flying mane, and flashing eyes, and flaring nostrils,
and feet that you'd swear didn't touch the ground once
in
An expressive glance from Seth interrupted this
beautiful rhapsody, and brought it to a rather lame
termination.
Not that I ever rode one myself, of course, being
a prisoner there, continued the other, but I've seen
the Moors ride, you know, very often.
You'll do
, repeated Seth, once more,
sotto voce
,
as followed by the admiring eyes of the negroes, the
friends withdrew into the house;
You'll do
butI
say!
What, Seth?
Do you know what is in that formidable looking
box, locked and strapped and cased in canvass?
4*
Certainly not.
Nor I, replied Van Corlear, smiling; but it
came from London about six weeks ago; the ship
that brought it had a long passage, or it would have
arrived before the time which was set for Harry's
marriage last spring. As it is
He knows nothing of its arrival?
Nothingand cares less.
It may be placed in my room, was the grave
reply. This is the key, I think; there are doubtless
some articles of wearing apparel which will require
airing;in fact, now that I reflect upon it, I believe
I ordered these things myself, just before I left
London
;it's
all rightall right.
CHAPTER VII.
Come
, Jessie, it is not necessary to be so very
particular
in arranging
your
curls; it is not
your
beau, I
believe, who is expected.
The amiable Gertrude had never forgiven her sister
for her fascinating appearance as bridesmaid, and
occasionally amused herself now by taunting her
with the futility of her charms in obtaining admirers.
Though, to be sure, she continued, Harmon may
possibly come, for I saw him passing but this instant
on horseback, with a bag of meal for a saddle. He
is a gallant cavalier, Jessie, and I caught him in the
very act of casting a tender glance this way, just as
his steed caracoled away.
Had not Harmon Van Dingle actually made some
awkward and indirect advances to Jessie; had not
old Baltus and Burley smoked seventeen pipes on the
subject, and settled the whole matter to their perfect
satisfaction, only to be indignantly vetoed by the little
beauty; had it not been for these things, Gertrude's
unfeeling joke would have had but little effect. As
it was, Jessie's blood for once boiled with wrath, for
you have been mistaken, gentle reader, if you have
supposed that Jessie Van Corlear was altogether an
angel. There are in reality no angels among mortals,
at least there were none returned in the census of New
York in the year 1690. But Jessie well knew that
she was no match, either in coolness or sarcasm, for
her practised sister, and she wisely refrained from
entering the lists against such unfavorable odds,
contenting
herself with shedding a few bitter tears, and
wondering seriously for the fiftieth time, what
enormous
crime she had been guilty of, to draw down
upon her head such accumulated misery.
It was about the middle of October, and Livingston,
who had spent the summer chiefly in travel in some
of the more southerly provinces, was expected home
on that day, and it was in allusion to his return that
Gertrude's first remark had been made. But her
agreeable anticipations were disappointed. The mail
stage from Philadelphia, which came in punctually
every other Saturday, arrived with its usual parade
at the old Crown and Anchor Inn, and although it
contained
nearly a dozen passengers, packed with
inconceivable
skill, it did not bring Harry Livingston. There
is undoubtedly a letter, however, thought the
disappointed
Gertrude, and one of the younger brothers
was forthwith despatched to the city post-office.
The Misses Van Dingle knew very well on what
day the Philadelphia coach came in, and they knew
equally well that the patroon was expected, like the
rain, somewhere about these days; but whether their
knowledge on these points had anything to do with a
friendly call which they now made upon Gertrude, it
is difficult to tell. They were daughters of Eve, and
had inherited, at an immense remove, an infinitesimal
portion of her curiosity; and let them not, therefore,
be blamed if they were desirous to behold a sight so
rare to them as a meeting between two long-separated
lovers. They cameno less lynx-eyed or spiteful
than usual, but a shade less lofty, for the Van Corlears
were now classed among the aristocracy. The fates
indeed were humbled. They felt as if the foot of the
haughty Gertrude were resting perpetually upon their
necks, and pressing down their very jugulars. But
if they had lost a small part of their pride, the
deficiency
was made up by an additional supply of secret
malice, so that, on the whole, the moral proportions of
their minds were tolerably well preserved. The
interview
was rather a formal one, for they had few
topics of conversation in common, but there was an
ancient and very convenient custom in New York,
which is now unfortunately obsolete, of talking much
about the weather; so that it was considered quite
allowable to tell an individual that it rained,
notwithstanding
he might, at the same instant, feel the proof
of the fact trickling down his neck. This went a
good way. And then the fates found opportunity to
vent a little venom by hinting at the dreariness of
living
in the wilderness, and Gertrude spoke once, in the
most accidental way, of her anticipated house in town.
They winced then, the fates did; and they were soon
after about retiring in utter discomfiture, when a
shuffling and snuffling without, announced the arrival
of Gertrude's penny-post extraordinary. He had
brought a letter too, and Miss Van Corlear, willing to
add a little to her triumph, extended her hand
carelessly
for the missive, remarking at the same time
that Harry wrote very frequently. But on looking at
the superscription, she slightly colored.
Ah, it's from that tiresome Seth, she said, filled
of course with fox-hunts, and long yarns about Jowler
and Towzer;
you
may read it, if you choose, she
continued, tossing the letter to Jessie, for I
certainly
sha'n't.
The letter was addressed to Livingston; but as he
had left word that all communications from Seth
might be opened at home, Jessie did not hesitate to
break the seal. Eager to hear anything from dear
Seth, and vexed that he was so unceremoniously
treated, her eye ran rapidly down the page. But
the letter dropped suddenly from her hand, and rising
to her feet she exclaimed, with a look of utter
astonishment
:
Bleecker Van Ness is alive, and at home!
Three shrieky exclamations were heard, and three
pairs of flail-like arms were thrown up; but silent
and pale as the sculptured marble, and as incapable
of speech, sat Gertrude. She found a voice at length,
though not seemingly her own, so hoarse and
unnatural
did it sound.
Bleecker Van Ness is
dead
, she said, emphasizing
the word, and buried in the sea, long years ago;
why will you repeat the idle tales of that vagrant
Seth?
Seth is no vagrant, returned Jessie mildly, and
extending the letter to her sister; read here the
details for yourself.
I will
not
read it, replied Gertrude, dashing the
paper to the floor, and striding across the room with
the air of a tragic queen; it is
false
, she said,
whoever says it;
false
, glancing at the visiters,
whoever repeats it.
So saying, she went out.
The fates lingered only long enough to assure Jessie
that they thought there must be some mistake about
itindeed they sincerely hoped so, and thought, for
their part, that nothing at all had better be said on
the subject for the present; and so saying they
hastened
to depart, and spread the news. The youngest,
indeed, was overheard to say, as she left the house,
that she always thought there was something
suspicious
in the looks of that Livingston.
Direful was the commotion at Van Corlear's; for
despite of Gertrude's affected incredulity, there was
too much reason to credit the unwelcome news.
Seth's letter had stated the facts too definitely to
admit of much question. The resemblance to the
portrait; the full recognition of the claimant by the
oldest of the slaves; and his consistent story in other
respects, scarcely left room for a doubt. Besides
this, the new heir manifested the utmost indifference
as to whether his claim was promptly admitted or
not, having, as he said, abundant evidence at
command
in the person of an old college acquaintance
now in England, who had shared his captivity in
Algiers.
Old Burley broke three successive pipes in trying
to fire up for reflection on this important subject, and
finally dashing pipes and tobacco together into the
fire, he gave way to a series of Dutch anathemas,
which, properly strung, would have reached half
way to Kenterhook. The tuyfel, he said, might
have come if he had chosen, and should have been
heartily welcome; but for this sea-soaked
mollyyhack
to turn up now, after lying six years quietly under
water,
potstausends!
said the old man,
donner and
blitzen!
and he stamped about the room until the
whole house rang with the echoes of his elephantine
feet.
Dame Van Corlear also was not a little afflicted,
for she too had indulged in her dreams of ambition,
though these were of an extremely modified
character
.
She had counted largely, indeed, on her
daughter's elevation to the superintendence of the
Kenterhook dairy, with its interminable rolls of
freshly made butter, and its long triple tiers of nicely
shelved and snowy little Dutch cheeses; and had
indulged
in some far-reaching visions of periodical
visits to the manor house on occasions of unusual
interest. But with the simplicity of a very guileless
heart, she did not think of suspecting the stranger's
claim. Bleecker, she said, was her own cousin
only six times removed, and was a very good boy,
and his rights were his rights, and of course he
wouldn't pretend to be alive if he wasn't, would he?',
Gertrude had descended sufficiently from her first
lofty position to peruse the dreadful letter, and she
felt a secret, sickening, withering conviction that its
contents were true. But she entertained no idea of
tame submission. If Bleecker Van Ness had really
returned, he was alone, friendless, and without
pecuniary
means to prosecute his claims; while
Livingston
,
already in possession of the estate, would be able
to keep up a protracted and expensive litigation,
which would be ruinous to his competitor. She did
not allow herself to doubt that the new claimant
would shrink from so unequal a contest, and that,
long accustomed to hardships and privations abroad,
he would gladly resign his pretensions for a
competence
that would insure him a quiet and peaceful
home. In a word, he was to be bought off. A few
thousand pounds would but slightly impair
Livingston's
magnificent estate, and were not worth a
thought. These were the flattering reflections in
which Gertrude indulged, as still holding the
abhorred
letter, she sat, in the deepest abstraction,
gazing upon the floor. But a sudden flush suffused
her pale face, and her little foot fell with a
hammer-like
force upon the carpet.
Oh why, she exclaimed, why must those
malicious
old maids, those very trumpeters of Fame, have
been here at such a moment! And why did that
very idiot of a Jessie proclaim it before them? The
neighborhoodthe cityaye, the whole province,
she continued, rising and clasping her hands in agony,
will
ring
with the news!
But Gertrude's grief was altogether secret; before
others she carefully concealed her apprehensions, and
treated the whole affair with ridicule.
Livingston at length came. He was met by Burley
without, bearing as dolorous a face as one so round
and rubicund could be, who returned his joyous
salutations
by hinting, in general terms, at intelligence of
the most dismal and awful nature. Appalled and
stunned at the thought of Gertrude's death or
dangerous
illness, the noble-hearted young man was really
relieved on learning that his misfortune extended only
to the probable loss of his property. Not that he was
unmoved at the prospect of so serious a calamity; on
the contrary his alarm was great. He hastened to
meet Gertrude, anxious to dispel her fears, but was
surprised to find that she manifested but little concern
on the subject. He was induced, indeed, by her
example
,
to hope that there was no serious ground for
apprehension. His prompt and honorable resolve was
to subject the claims of the stranger to the severest
scrutiny, and, if fully convinced of his rights, to
surrender
the estate without litigation. But before
learning
this conclusion, Gertrude had hinted in no
ambiguous
terms, at her own ingenious scheme, provided
indeed, which she very much doubted, that any action
at all should be requisite.
Surely, Gertrude, replied Livingston, this is
hardly a subject to jest upon.
I do not jest, returned Miss Van Corlear, but I
would not have you sacrifice everything to a mere
abstract idea of right and wrong.
A sudden pallor overspread the face of Livingston.
And is it thus, he said, that you designate the
immutable
principle of Justice?
Gertrude had the grace to color at this reproof, and
murmured something to the effect that she was
scarcely conscious of what she said or thought on so
exciting a subject. The patroon mused sadly and in
silence for some minutes upon so startling a disclosure
of principles, but came charitably to the conclusion
that Gertrude's remarks had been only the result of a
thoughtless and momentary impulse. He at once
addressed
a letter to Seth, inviting his guest to pay him
a personal visit at Van Corlear's, that he might have
the means of judging of the correctness of his claims.
To this he received a ready answer from the claimant
himself, assuring him that he would do himself the
honor to wait upon Mr. Livingston in a very few days,
until when, he begged that he might be considered
the latter's very much obliged, and very humble, and
very obedient servant.
How this distinguished gentleman travelled from
Kenterhook to New York does not with any certainty
appear, but he arrived at Van Corlear's from the city
in no small state. A sumptuous carriage and a span
of pawing, champing horses, and a coachman black as
Night, and a footman still blacker, were seen, suddenly
standing before the alderman's gate, fully exposed to
an extensive masked battery of eyes from the Van
Dingle garrison opposite, including the cross guns of
Miss Eve. The dress of the individual who alighted
from this vehicle corresponded with his travelling
equipage. The hands of no provincial artisan had
been upon the elegant apparel that enveloped the
graceful form of Mr. Bleecker Van Ness. If it had
been allowable to criticise the labors of a London shop,
a practised eye might possibly have found fault with
the fitting of some of these trans-atlantic garments,
but nothing could be more captivating than the rich
ample cloak, as yet unknown in the colonies, which
hung suspended from the shoulders, and fell in many
a graceful fold around the faultless legs of the new
patroon.
Gertrude's heart sank within her, as she perceived
all these evidences of resources in the stranger. She
feared that he would hardly prove a purchasable
commodity, or if so, that he was undoubtedly marked
up exceedingly high, with no discount for the ready
money. Now it so chanced that Livingston was
absent in the city, at the time of this important visit,
and it so happened, nay, it did not happen, for it was a
pre-concerted plan of Gertrude's, that there was a
pompous pragmatical Dutch lawyer, named Van
Bummel, a cousin of the Van Corlears, tarrying with
the family for a few days. He was not exactly
retained
in a professional manner, but Gertrude was
anxious to avoid the dangerous effect of first
impressions
in favor of the new heir, and she had great
confidence
in her cousin's adroitness in making any given
subject whatever wear just such an aspect as he chose.
In company with that gentleman, therefore, and with
him only, Gertrude contrived to receive the
distinguished
guest, who, having been assured that Mr.
Livingston would soon be at home, had graciously
consented to await his return. Miss Van Corlear's
reception of her visiter was cool to the last degree;
and Van Bummel, in addressing him as Mr. Van Ness,
thought proper to do so under special protest that he
did not thereby admit or deny the gentleman's right
to the cognomen which he had assumed, but left the
matter entirely open for future proof, or rebuttal, in
the same manner as if he had never spoken,
pronounced
,
uttered, ejaculated, or mentioned the same
in any manner whatever. The stranger replied only
by a contemptuous stare at the swoln-looking attorney,
and helping himself to a seat near Gertrude, he
assured
her that it was with the greatest pain he had
learned that his assumption of his legal rights at home
was to be accompanied by severe disappointment on
the part of some of his worthy relations. The lady
replied, that from what little she had learned upon the
subject, she believed there was no cause for his giving
himself any very great uneasiness upon that point;
and that although Mr. Harry Livingston and his
friends would never be found backward in restoring to
others their rights, she did not think that a princely
estate was to be yielded up merely for the asking,
even although the modest claimant should possess an
accidental resemblance to the true heir.
I admire, madam, replied the other, the very
ingenious and very correct view which you seem to
have of this matter. I have said frequently to your
brother Seth, Cousin Harry will recognize me at a
glance; he will see the fidelity of the portrait in his
own study, at which he has so often gazed, and he
will never dream of disputing my rights. But it is, as
you say, a princely estate to which I lay claim, and I
would prefer making stronger proof of my title. I
have the most ample evidence at command, and with
cousin Harry's permission, shall despatch a special
messenger at once to Englandanother to the
Netherlands
and
a third totoAlgiers.
It is very well, interposed Van Bummel, that
you are in no particular haste if you propose to await
5
the return of your express from Algiers. He would
do well to carry his ransom in his pocket.
Ah, never fear, returned Derick; I assure you
I left the city on very good terms with the Dey.
And how, if I may inquire, continued the
pertinacious
Van Bummel, how was your own release
effected
?
With that of seventeen others, by the intervention
of the British government, replied Derick promptly.
My friend, Lord Sidney, heard, by the merest
accident
,
of my imprisonment, through an escaped sailor,
who had once seen that noble lord and myself
walking
arm-in-arm in front of Somerset House, and who,
fortunately for me, had a devilish good memory.
Yes, sir, continued the lawyer, it was so; and
it would perhaps be still more fortunate for you, if
you had a good memory yourself. Do we not very
well know that the English government is deeply
engaged in intestine warsthat the whole realm is
agitated with the struggles of the dethroned monarch
to regain his lost crownand that the royal William,
but half secure of his throne, would be little apt to
give heed to any such trivial matters?
I must say, returned Derick, that you are
exceedingly
,
nay, I may say, surpassingly impertinent,
and that at a proper time I will hold you responsible
therefor. Yet for the satisfaction of this lady, I will
make answer, that it was during a temporary lull of
the war that my friend found access to the ear of
King Williamdespatched a man-of-war to the
Barbary
coastbombarded the city of Algiersdestroyed
seventy-three houses and three mosques, and brought
the Dey to terms in twenty-four hours.
Nay, then, replied Van Bummel, with a
scintillation
of Dutch wit, if the
Dey
held out for
twenty-four
hours
, that was certainly as much as could be
expected
.
Although this joke produced a laugh, it did not
seem in the least to soften the asperity of Van Bummel
himself, who, lowering his spectacles, and eyeing
Derick still more closely, continued:
And so the Moorish monarch not only released
you, but took you to his palace, I warrant, filled your
pockets with gold, and gave you an order on his lord
high tailor for a suit of Christian clothes?
Under protest again, against your very amusing
impudence, not so, replied Derick. You are
surprised
to see me well dressed, and apparently in no
want of money. The secret is plain; I have been in
the hands of the Jews.
The Jews? They are said to leave scarcely the
skin, much less a covering of superfine saxony on their
customers.
You misunderstand me: it is a common thing
abroad to raise money of the usurers on estates in
expectancy. I have supplied my wants from this
source; and, by the way, he continued, finding that
Van Bummel pressed him pretty hard, I find that I
have a few thousand pounds more than I require,
which I should like to put into safe hands for
investment
possibly into yours
.
The latter part of this speech was addressed in a
low tone to the attorney, and produced a singular
change in his deportment. His hitherto rattling fire
occurred now at long intervals, and finally sunk to a
mere pop-gun affair. He soon, indeed, called
Gertrude
aside, and to her great consternation informed
her that he thought, on the whole, there could be
no rational doubt that the individual before them was
Mr. Bleecker Van Ness, the rightful proprietor of all
the estates of Kenterhook. The interview having
been considerably protracted without the return of
Livingston, the guest took his leave, and promised to
call again on the ensuing day.
CHAPTER VIII.
Gertrude
had seen the new heir. She had
observed
,
despite her unwillingness, his resemblance to
the late patroon; she had seen him undergo what she
thought a rigid cross-examination from her own legal
adviser, and even that had proved unfavorable to
her interests. Was there then no hope? Should
the fates triumph over her? Should she be the
laughing-stock of the whole world? Noshe would
not submit. Harry should defend his rights to the
very last! To the high court of Parliament, if
necessary
,
should the question go, to be settled in some
future
generation, among future heirs. Such was the
determination of Gertrude, to which, with an iron
will, she resolved that Harry should consent. Even
although the stranger was the true heir, she argued
to herself, his claim was too old to be thus trumped
up when the rights of so many others had become
involved
.
Possession is nine parts of the law; what
can't be proved, doesn't exist, she said, with several
other equally moral axioms, which she had caught up
from her astute counsel before his sudden conversion.
When Livingston returned from the city, it was in
company with old Aunt Schermerhorn, who had once
seen Bleecker Van Ness, and who thought she could
settle the question of identity; for Harry's mind was
so harassed with the excitement that he was anxious
in some way to terminate his suspense. He had a
painful presentiment that his own very first glance of
the stranger's face would be convincing as to the
correctness of his pretensions; but he felt that he
ought not to be satisfied with that proof alone.
Gertrude
hastened to relate to him the interview of the
morning, to which, of course, she gave her own
coloring
,
while the old lawyer maintained a discreet silence,
not being quite certain yet which way the wind would
set.
Derick was faithful to his appointment on the
ensuing
day, and was received this time in committee
of the whole. A thrill of amazement, distinct and
perceptible, seemed to pass through the whole
company
,
on their simultaneous perception of a
countenance
which, whoever or whatever it belonged to
was so strikingly like that of the good old patroon.
Dame Van Corlear was just restrained by an
imperative
frown from Gertrude, from rising and grasping
the visiter by the hand; while, in the strong
resemblance
to the portrait of Bleecker, Livingston had an
additional ground of apprehension, and his few
remaining
hopes were fast flitting away. The
salutations
on both sides were courteous, though cool, and
conversation at once took a business turn. Aunt
Schermerhorn was the only one of the company who
had ever seen Bleecker since he was a very small
boy, and some favorable turn was hoped for from her
verdict. The stranger made no hesitation in
submitting
to a close scrutiny from the old dame, who, having
wiped her spectacles with great care, walked
deliberately
up to him, and peered silently for some minutes
into his face. Gertrude's heart beat violently, and
even poor Harry felt his breath come quicker during
this examination. There was perfect silence in the
room, and the excitement, of which even the old lady
seemed to partake, grew momentarily stronger.
Again and again did she gaze at each individual
feature
,
and when, at length, she lowered her spectacles
to speak, more than one heart stood suddenly still with
emotion.
I think it is Bleecker!
said the old lady, and
Gertrude
lay swooning upon the floor. Borne from the
room, and speedily resuscitated, it was only, in the
violence of her emotion, to heap reproaches upon
Livingston, who with affectionate solicitude sought to
dispel her grief.
Why, she said, should you search out witnesses
against yourself, and aid your adversary to make good
his claims? Never mortal before heard of such
fatuity! If you are so soon tired of your wealth,
Mr. Livingston, remember that there are others who
have a right now to be consulted in its disposal.
Bewildered
by anger and mortification, such was the
language of Gertrude. Livingston listened for a few
moments with the keenest anguish to the revelations
thus opened to him, of a heart which he had long so
devotedly loved. But he listened in silence. He
returned to the parlor with a settled conviction that
fate had no remaining dart in all its armory for him,
more keen than those which he had already felt. If
5*
such were the wealth of human love; if all the
treasures
of affection amounted to but this, then not for a
few square miles of soil would he condescend to
grieve. Two cubic yards would better subserve the
purpose of any rational man, for that would serve to
hide him from a world deserving only of execration
and contempt. Such were the first bitter thoughts that
forced themselves in a dark current over the mind of
the ingenuous youth, flooding and overwhelming for a
while every nobler sentiment. But a better spirit soon
returned. The very violence of his feelings caused a
sudden reaction, and Hope and Charity came hastening
back to the posts from which they had been temporarily
frightened. He would be better satisfied yet before he
recognized the stranger's claims and yielded up dear
Gertrude's rights. Having made this resolve, he
reentered
the room where Derick was entertaining the
company with the accounts of his toils under cruel
taskmasters, upon the piers and fortifications of the
barbarian's capital. The subject of identity being
resumed, Aunt Schermerhorn suggested that there was
one relation of the family who she thought could settle
the matter beyond dispute, by reason of his know
intimacy
with the late patroon, and that was a cousin,
of the same name, who lived far off to the north, away
beyond Schagticoke, but whose Christian name she
had forgotten.
Ah, I remember him, interposed Derick; old
cousin Bartholomew! a lame old cock!
That's the name, replied Aunt Schermerhorn,
Bartholomew; and he
is
very lame.
Harry turned a thought paler at this additional
proof in the stranger's favor. He whispered a
moment
with the old lady, and then proceeded to ask
one more question, trembling while he awaited a
reply
.
If you do, indeed, remember him so well, he
said, there is still another peculiarity of his person
which you can hardly have forgotten.
Derick drew his finger diagonally across his upper
lip and smiled; it was in allusion to a hare-lip of the
old man, and seemed conclusive beyond further cavil.
I can no longer doubt, said Harry, extending his
hand to his cousin, that you are what you claim to
be. As the son of my deceased friend and benefactor,
I welcome you,his voice faltered as he spokeI
heartily welcome you back to your native land. For
the sake of those whose interests are bound up in my
own, and who have a right to be more incredulous
than myself, I will not offer to resign to you your
rights, until your witness arrives from England.
Until then, however, share with me in everything of
what thereafter will be exclusively your own.
Not exclusively, cousin Harry, returned Derick,
pompously; I intend that the Wilton farm shall be
yours.
Harry looked surprised at this narrow generosity
for the land alluded to, although a tract of about a
thousand acres, was scarcely worth half that number
of pounds. He made, however, no reply. His cousin
expressed himself perfectly willing to await returns
from England, and his entire readiness to acquiesce
in this proposal dispelled the last shade of doubt that
had rested on his claims. There would be nearly a
year's delay preceding his full investiture in his rights,
but he was looked upon as virtually the present owner
of the deceased patroon's estates. But Derick had
still a further ordeal to undergo, for although he was
now no longer questioned by way of testing his claims,
a natural desire pervaded the minds of his companions
to learn all the particulars of those remarkable
vicissitudes
of fortune to which he had been subjected. So
reasonable a curiosity could not be censured, and
vainly did he seek to evade the torrent of questions
which was poured in upon him from all quarters, but
chiefly, of course, from the sympathizing old ladies.
Tell us about your capture, exclaimed Aunt
Schermerhorn, all about it, and the fighting, and the
black flag and all; and where it was, and how many
were killed, and strangled, and bow-stringed, and
goodness gracious me! do tell us all about it now!
she said, drawing her chair closer to Derick, and
folding up her spectacles, as she gazed with watery
eyes into his face.
Derick, thus adjured, buried his face for a moment
in his handkerchief, doubtless to conceal the emotion
which it would have been unmanly to betray, as
the remembrance of some dreadful scenes returned
to his mind.
Well, you see, he said, speaking with the
hesitation
which strong emotion always occasions, we
were somewhere in latitude about forty-four, and
longitude
let
me seesay twenty-two west from
Greenwichwhen we were overtaken by a
tremendous
gale, most tre-
men
-dous; and were compelled to
scud under bare poles.
Bare
polls
indeed, muttered Van Bummel, in a
voice inaudible to Derick; it blew your hats off, I
suppose.
Seventy-four hours and a halfand a half
Going, whispered the lawyer
did that wind continue, whistling, howling,
screaming among the cordage of the vessel, like some
wild animal, impatient for his prey.
This poetical flight arrested the attention of Van
Bummel, who being himself a wholesale dealer in
flowers of rhetoric, began to think he might pick up
something for future use, and closed his jaws for
once as firmly as those of a steel-trap.
So dreadful and so long-continued was the blast,
continued Derick, that it seemed impossible we
should finally escape its fury, and our ship lay at one
time for six hours together on her beam-ends.
Awful! exclaimed Aunt Schermerhorn, right
straight up on end! wellgo on.
We were of course blown off our track many
hundred miles, and when the gale abated we found
ourselves off the north-western coast of Africa.
Maircy! said the old lady, hitching her chair
still nearer to Derick, but without removing her eyes
from his face.
Yes, ma'am, continued the latter, and not more
than fifty miles from the Mediterranean. The
captain
then put the ship about, and made all sail for
America, but we had not gone more than three knots
before we discovered a fast-sailing sloop-of-war on
the weather-bow, coming down upon us like the wind.
It was an English-built ship, and under English colors,
and no one thought of being alarmed until she was
close alongside, when down came the banner of St.
George, and up went the black flag; while at the
same instant two hundred blackamoors who had been
concealed on deck sprang to their feet, with a
tremendous
shout, and sixteen long cannon were
suddenly
unmasked, pointing their great black open
mouths straight at usand the captain, a hideous
looking Moor, stood waving his sword on the
quarter-deck, and calling on us to surrender. There
was no use in fighting; they would have blown us
out of water and air too in ten seconds at the very
most, and so our captain struck his flag. Then you
see, ma'am, they boarded us at once, and instantly put
to death
Oh, maircy! maircy!
all our pigs and poultry; for they had been at
sea a long time, and were quite out of fresh provisions.
They would doubtless have served us in the same way,
if we had not been worth more to them alive. They
took us straight to Algiers, and reported us to the
government, as so many head of infidels, fit for labor,
and so many invalidstwo or three, you know, poor
sickly fellows, whom they just Derick here
waved his curved finger toward the back of his neck
by way of conclusion.
What? what? asked Aunt Schermerhorn, with
distended eyes.
The
scimetar
, you know, he continuedone
blow, and the head was overboard, with the lips still
moving that had begged for mercy!
The old ladies here gave a united scream, under
cover of which Derick attempted to retreat, with
the promise of resuming his narrative at some future
time; but this design was frustrated by his eager
listeners.
Wan't you terribly scairt, Bleecker? asked Dame
Van Corlear.
Well, I must say those health-officers frightened
me a littlefor I was rather puny then, and they
seemed to hesitate on my case, one feeling of me, and
the other standing by with his scimetar. It was neck
or nothing then, ma'am. But they pushed me aside
and passed on, and the next day I found myself
wheeling a barrow of dirt up a steep hill, a Sisyphan
sort of amusement, which I was allowed to pursue
steadily for the next eighteen months, after which I
was promoted to laying stone. I shouldn't have cared
so much for the work, for I grew as fat as a seal on
it, but it was rather aggravating to be ordered about
by a black Moor, with a turban on his head, sixteen
inches of beard, and a whip in his hand.
And you a patroon's son, too, said Aunt
Schermerhorn
.
And I a patroon's son, too, said Derick.
There were some points in this story which aroused
the pettifogging spirit of Van Bummel not a little
and he began to square himself for a few puzzling
cross-questions, his very spectacles assuming for a
moment an air of triumph, when he fortunately
remembered
that his interest was on the other side,
which, on the whole, he concluded must be the right
side, saying nothing at all about the investments.
Gertrude had not been present during the latter part
of the consultation, but she was soon informed of its
result. A stormy train of passions continued to
agitate
her mind, but amidst them all was nought of
commiseration
for Harry; no thought of self-censure,
humility, or submission.
CHAPTER IX.
Alone
, in her own room, pondering deeply upon
the past, remembering with a gleam of ecstasy the
sunny hopes which had once flashed across her mind,
and then forever disappeared, sat Jessie. Long
endured
and long concealed sorrow had slightly impaired
the crimson tinge of her cheek, and changed a little, a
very little, that elastic step, from which, in other days,
the bending flowers had risen unharmed.
Notwithstanding
her sister had been so studiously cold and
cruel toward her, she would still have felt a deep
commiseration
for her under any real calamity; but she
had no sympathy for a distress which proceeded solely
from disappointed ambition, and she could not but feel
that so lofty a pride deserved so great a fall. What
was there, indeed, in Gertrude's fate, that demanded
pity? She looked into her own heart, and felt that
under similar circumstances the loss of wealth would
have wrung no sigh from her; nay, that she would
almost have rejoiced at the opportunity which
adversity
ever gives of winning a closer shelter under the
wings of affection. And such was the light, she did
not doubt, in which her sister would soon regard the
change, laughing at the remembrance of present grief.
Poor simple Jessie! such was thy faith still in
Gertrude
,
the proud, the cold, the scornful Gertrude,
whose heart, to thine, was as the barren sand-bank to
the flowery parterre.
It was not until some hours after the departure of
Derick, that Livingston sought the presence of Miss
Van Corlear. He came to bestow condolence where
he had a right to seek itto ask forgiveness where
he might require apology. Unmoved by calamity,
overflowing with kindness, he came to meet still a
haughty frown and imperious demands. Then, even
then, Gertrude found it in her heart to ask, nay to
insist upon what she had resolved should be.
Let the
Law
, she said, determine this great
question; when the courts, aye, the
last
court of
appeal
shall have adjudicated it, then it will be time
enough to surrender your rights.
In vain did Livingston assure her that nothing short
of the most conclusive proof should satisfy him.
It is not enough, she said; you must employ
skilful counsel, who are accustomed to unweave, aye,
and to
weave
tangled webs, and who will soon, I
warrant
you, raise such a pother about this interloper's
ears that he will be glad to retreat with whatever
you choose to give him.
And do you really mean, Gertrude, asked
Livingston
,
solemnly, that I should do all this, even if I
am myself convinced that his claim is just?
You have no
right
to be convinced, she replied
quickly; it is a question for the courts to settle.
Ask
legal
proof, that will bear sifting and re-sifting;
use all the complicated machinery of the Law; throw
the case into Chancery, only to come out in another
century, and by such means you will at least secure
the estate for your own life-time, which is all that is
really important. Do not seek to be so much better
than your neighbors; others have done it, why not
you?
I could indeed, said Harry, do all that you
require. The Law is a friend to the rich. Drive
but to its temples in a coach-and-six, and you may
drive over the broken hearts and crushed hopes of the
hapless crowds who throng, penniless, around its gates.
But when I consent to do
this
mark me now,
Gertrude
Van Corlear! when I consent to use the
tortures
,
the racks, and the thumb-screws of the Law,
to defraud the son of my old, aye, my
only
friend,
then may his loved form rise from its grave, and
haunt me till I sink into my own!
It was not with the declamation of the schools, but
with the richer eloquence of nature, attested by
quivering
lips and gushing tears, that this was said. But
Gertrude was not moved.
If it is in the light of a
threat
, she rejoined, that
you speak of your deceased uncle as your only friend,
let me assure you, Mr. Livingston
Nay, Gertrude, forbear! I anticipate your
meaning
.
Let it not all come to this, or at least not now.
Take a little time to reflect, and we may yet be happy
in the realization of brighter days even than those
that we have so long anticipated. In calmer
moments
I am calm
now
, Mr. Livingston; calm enough to
say that your visions of a quiet cottage and clustering
honeysuckles are unsuited to my taste.
A better spirit, Gertrude, will be yoursyou will
repent
No, Mr. Livingston; he who refuses me the first
boon that I ever asked of him, will probably refuse
the last.
And are you then, really, in earnest? Do you
ask no time to reflect? a week? a day? an hour,
even?
Not a minute, sir!
And thus they parted.
That same evening beheld Livingston on his way
homeward. Not without kind words and earnest
entreaties from Gertrude's parents to prolong his
stay; but without another word sought or given
from her. His leave-taking was a hasty one, and
none knew of the quarrel but as it might be guessed
by his pale cheek and excited bearing. Dame Van
Corlear, never too astute, suspected nothing amiss.
That the nuptials should be again postponed, was,
under the circumstances, not a matter of surprise,
and perhaps scarcely of regret. Pressing business of
some kind, growing out of the new state of things,
doubtless demanded Harry's abrupt departure. She
never dreamed, good soul, and never would have
consented, as far as her influence went, to any
estrangement between him and Gertrude. As to
the alderman, so many remarkable events had put
him in great perplexity, and in vain did he seek to
clarify his ideas with his never-dying pipe. A little
smoking volcano, grumbling mightily within, and
threatening continual eruptions, was Burley. Like
the thin vapors that rose around him, like the
ignis
fatuus
of the marsh, like the
mirage
of the desert, all
his anticipated honors were vanishing from his view.
Not that this imagery of thought passed through
Burley's mind. He dealt but little in similes, and in
those of a different class. Mixed metaphors were
Burley's, for in his mind everything was mixed. It
possessed, indeed, an agglomerating power peculiar
to itself, and over its recondite treasures hung a
perpetual
haze, undisturbed by one clear and lucid idea.
Had such a visiter found entrance there, it would
have been like a stray sunbeam amid the cobwebs of
a dungeon. Some men's first impressions are
correct
,
and some attain certainty by reflection; but to
neither of these classes belonged Burley. Before,
therefore, he could decide whether Harry's departure
boded evil or good, the latter was gone, and, gliding
quietly over the waters of the Hudson, was reflecting
painfully on the singular turn of fortune, which in one
short week had divested him of home, of property,
and of friends.
6
CHAPTER X.
It
had been a hard day's chase, had Seth's, but not,
as the bleeding trophies of his skill attested, not a
fruitless one. A noble stag formed the nucleus of a
pile of smaller game which lay in the court, and
around which, like so many crows, chattering and
gabbling, the delighted negroes, young and old, were
clustered. While one examined the larger victim, to
see at what point the fatal ball had entered, others
handled the hapless wild fowl or the glossy squirrel,
and the merry Josh was fingering exultingly the
carcass
of a silver fox to see if its unbroken skin would
afford material for a winter's cap. 'Tis de berry
feller, he said, putting his finger upon him, and
looking
gravely up, while his huge lower lip seemed to
swell with emotion, de berry feller dat stole my
chickens, kase I see him one mornin' arly, jes peep
o' day, draggin' off a squalkin' old hen. Darefore,
raising the body of Reynard, and looking to the
patriarchal Jake for approval, darefore his hide is
mine. Taking a paralytic and involuntary nod of
uncle Jake's head for assent, he ran off with his prize,
making the yard ring with his laughter, and followed
by a troop of noisy children.
Seth, fatigued with his day's labors, sat resting
within. His mind had reverted, as it did twenty
times a day, to the state of affairs at home, and he
was becoming anxious to know the result of an
experiment
which he had but recently remembered he never
had the right to make. He had acted from an
impulse
created by generous feelings; yet he had acted
wrong. Fearful of some indefinite harm, he was
pondering deeply on the subject, when an additional
shout and commotion was heard without, so loud that
he was almost prepared to see his slaughtered stag
returned to life, and scampering back to the forests.
Nothing else occurred to him at the moment that
could have caused such a turmoil. He started toward
the door, where he was met by the whole gang, each
eager to be first in announcing that a sloop was
coming up the river, and putting in toward the
adjacent
landing. Seth ran out, and perceiving the
intelligence
to be true, hastened to the wharf attended by
his sable train. That the vessel was the bearer either
of Livingston or Derick he did not for a moment
doubt, but the uncertainty as to everything else
threw him into a state of nervous excitement most
painful to endure. That his brilliant scheme had all
fallen to the ground by some blunder or inefficiency
of his coadjutor, and that Derick had returned
discovered
and disgraced, was his first fearful suspicion.
His next, that Livingston and Gertrude were
themselves
on board the vessel, and the white wing of a
passing gull was, for a moment, transformed by his
excited fears into the flaunting feathers of his sister's
bridal bonnet. Great therefore was his delight to
find that Harry had returned alone. The greeting
between the young men was cordial in the extreme,
and there was but little in Livingston's countenance
or deportment to mark the extent of his recent
sufferings
.
His views and feelings indeed had already
undergone
a material change. His grief was turned
into the most bitter indignation. Gertrude's
faithlessness
,
her desertion of him at the very onset of
adversity
her
total absence of sympathy for his sufferings,
and above all, her hardihood in requiring of him an
act of positive injustice as the price of her continued
regard, began all to appear in its true light. Baleful
indeed was that light. It was as if an angel radiant
with beauty, had suddenly assumed the features and
the scowl of a fiend. Livingston no longer loved.
The glowing flame of his affection was extinguished
at once and forever. He grieved indeed, not for the
loss of Gertrude, but because the Gertrude of his
imagination had never existed. He felt that he had
been standing, with closed eyes, on the brink of a
precipice, and that some friendly hand had drawn
him forcibly back from the danger.
Safely as Seth had calculated on Gertrude's
character
,
he was not prepared to hear that it had been
so soon developed. He had no expectation of news
as good as that. And when he heard it; when he
heard that the engagement was finally and effectually
broken off, beyond all possible reconciliation, he was
for a while as fit a candidate for a lunatic asylum, as
ever entered the walls of Bloomingdale. Hastening
to get away from Harry's presence, that he might
give way to his merriment, he flew to the barnan old
barn it was, habited by a thousand echoes which
joined in the roystering laugh, and the hearty three
times three of his loud huzzas. He danced, he
shouted, he flung his cap to the roof for the fiftieth
time, which the roof, joining in the sport, finally
caught with splintery fingers, and refused to return,
twinkling gleefully down upon him with a pair of
knot-hole eyes. And when he had exhausted his own
strength, he summoned Josh, famed for his
obstreperous
mirth, and exhibiting a piece of money, bade
the negro laugh for him to about that value, and to
mind and do his best. Josh roared at the very idea
of the thing, for his cachinnatory apparatus was set
with a hair trigger, and went off easily. His
detonations
were perfectly astounding, while his employer,
panting and grinning, sat cheering him on. When
this little business matter was over, Seth returned
quietly to the house, with a face not materially redder
than a peony.
Livingston bore his changed fortunes with
reasonable
fortitude. But he was no stoic. He looked
abroad upon the immense estate of which he was but
yesterday the proprietor, commanding a personal
influence
unsurpassed in private life in the whole
province
,
and he remembered that he was now a beggar,
dependent on his own exertions, or on the stinted
generosity of his cousin, for the very means of
existence
.
He had already seen in Gertrude's conduct a
specimen of the changed treatment which he might
expect from the world under his calamity.
Reflection
therefore served to magnify his grief and his
fears. By degrees he confided to Seth all the
particulars
of his quarrel with Gertrude, and was
astonished
to find that his friend manifested no kind of
surprise
at the recital. It was no small budget of
charges and specifications that the young Van
Corlear
,
acting on this hint, opened against his haughty
sister, and Harry was really relieved to learn that her
recent conduct, characteristic of herself, was not
necessarily
a type of all human nature. Misanthropy
had begun to overshadow with her ebon wings his
tortured mind, but the cheering voice of his
companion
recalled him to hope. A ready listener, too, did
Seth now find whenever he felt disposed to chant the
praises of Jessie, for Harry had himself begun to
remember her many excellencies, her exceeding
beauty and gentleness, her frankness, modesty and
truth. He remembered, too, how often he had
thought, yet banished the idea as treason to Gertrude,
that an earlier acquaintance with Jessie might
possibly
have made her the object of his choice. Would
she, he said suddenly to himself, have deserted me
thus? Would she have been the very first to forsake
me, setting an example for the hollow-hearted world
to follow? His whole heart, sending its warm
life-tide
forth with renewed force, answered, No!
It was a bright November morning, and Livingston
was sitting in his study arranging the few papers
which would be needed in rendering an account of his
brief stewardship, when Seth, suddenly entering the
room, invited his friend to accompany him to the
observatory
,
a modern addition to the house, which,
although
looking very much out of place, and very ill
at ease, commanded an extensive and magnificent
view. The broad and noble Hudson, forest-lined, lay
spread out before them, with calm unbroken surface,
and in the distance, the lofty Kaatskill mountains
were seen mingling their summits with the sky. But
not on these objects, long familiar to their view, did
the attention of the young men rest.
Do you see, said Seth, pointing to a house set
upon a hill, nearly ten miles southward, do you see
that distant building?
Yes, replied Harry; there lives one of the
tenants
of Bleecker Van Ness.
And do you see, rejoined Seth, this other
dwelling
with windows glistening in the sun? pointing to
one about the same distance northward.
Yes, was the reply; there lives another of the
tenants of Bleecker Van Ness.
And do you see yonder lofty oak? continued
the querist, pointing to a conspicuous tree, leafless and
bare, several miles eastward.
I do, replied Harry; it is on the eastern line of
Bleecker's estate.
And all the intermediate land?
Is Bleecker'swhy do you torture me with these
questions?
Harry Livingston! exclaimed Seth, grasping his
companion's hand, and looking earnestly in his face,
Harry Livingston! there is
no
Bleecker Van Ness!
You
are the owner of these broad lands! You are the
patroon of Kenterhook! Hate me, punish me as you
6*
choose;
I
am the author of the delusion which has
so long held you spell-bound.
There was truth in every line of Seth's honest face,
truth in every sparkle of his eye; Harry could not
doubt it. Alternately flushed and pale with emotion,
aye, with deep unutterable joy, he spoke with
difficulty
in reply:
Who then is the pretended heir?
His name is indeed Van Ness, and he is a son of
that cousin Bartholomew, who
Enough! I see it all now; and what, Seth, has
been the object of this strange drama?
What has been its
effect?
retorted Seth
triumphantly
.
True, true, exclaimed Harry, emphatically;
you have given me a brief, bitter experience, but
you have saved me from a life-long sorrow.
It was with a proud step that Livingston once more
walked abroad upon his ancestral soil; his foot fell
firmly on the ground, and he gazed with delight on
the beautiful landscape around him. It is
mine!
he
said, musing deeply, and feeling that strong sense of
gratitude to Providence, without which all happiness
wants its highest relish; for his was no selfish joy, no
petty pride of purse, no contemptible love of property
for its own sake.
But Seth was far from feeling an equal delight.
His object was but half accomplished, and over the
remaining part he felt that he had no control.
Livingston
grew taciturn and thoughtful, as the few
succeeding
weeks rolled by, but did not seem unhappy.
Of a confiding and generous nature, his
disappointment
had been at first painful to endure, but reflection
had summoned both Pride and Anger to his relief,
auxiliaries which had waged war with Grief, and left
upon the battle-ground of his heart no vestiges of
affection
.
Whatever might thenceforth be his destiny,
Gertrude must forever remain to him a stranger, and
that bright page of Memory, which had been filled
with thoughts of her, was to be a perpetual blank.
It was about ten days prior to Christmas that a
changed deportment in the young patroon gave token
of some new and sudden resolution. There might be
doubts about it, his eye and manner seemed to say, but
it should be done. His countenance assumed that
calmness and serenity which follows the decision of
mental conflict, his voice became cheerful, and after
the lapse of a few days he threw Seth into another
paroxysm of ecstacies, by proposing that they should
return at once to New York, to spend the holidays.
I consider my old invitation, he said, sufficient
warrant for the visit, and you will, of course, be
welcome
.
Never fear for the welcome, replied Seth; hip
hiphurrah!
CHAPTER XI.
And
how dush it all stand now? asked Burley,
pipe in hand, one December morning, after vainly
trying
to unite the fragments of several ideas, that were
floating dreamily through his head: how dush it all
stand? who ish de patroon, and who ishn't? Has de
Dey of Algiers come yet? Where ish Harry, and
where ish Bleecker, and where ish Getty, mit all mine
guilters?
This was considerably the longest speech that the
alderman had made since moving the honorable board
that Mynheer Focke Jans should have his weekly
half-barrel
of beer free of exciseat which said Jans's
house, the said honorable board were accustomed to
meetthereby foreshadowing the future privileges to
which the fathers of the city should attain. A
categorical
reply seemed to be demanded to these
questions
,
and it was given by Vrow Van Corlear in a
breath, to the purport that Bleecker Van Ness was
the patroon, and Harry Livingston wasn't, and the
Dey of Algiers had not come yet, and was not
expected
,
owing to pressing engagements at home, and that
Gertrude had gone on a visit to Aunt Schermerhorn's,
but the guilders she knew nothing at all about, and it
was precious few of them that she ever saw, or ever
expected to see. These answers put Burley into a
brown study, from which he did not emerge for the
remainder of the day.
The last few weeks had been to Jessie a period of
unusual gloom. Added to her private griefs, her
shame and indignation at Gertrude's conduct, and her
sympathy for Livingston under his two-fold calamity,
made up a total of trouble which told rapidly upon
the bloom of her beautiful cheek. It had been rumored
that Harry had entered the provincial army, and was
going to the northern frontiers, to take part in the
war then pending with the French. Gertrude had
heard the story from Derick with secret pleasure, and
had repeated it to Jessie, adding, that she really hoped
he would get promoted, for he was certainly a very
good sort of body, but for some old-fashioned notions.
And by the way, Jessie, she continued, why don't
you persuade your Harmon to enlist, for a campaign
or two? He might distinguish himself by killing an
Indianor a papoose, perhaps,and then you could
have it on your coat-of-arms!
But the scalpel of Gertrude's wit had become
powerless
,
and her sister listened to her only with silent
contempt. She had now, as has been stated, gone on
a visit, self-invited, to dear old Aunt Schermerhorn,
for whom she had conceived a very sudden affection.
It is true that Derick's hotelfor Derick was still
living at a dashing style in the citywas somewhere
in the same neighborhood, and that he was compelled
to call occasionally on the old lady in gratitude for
her ready recognition of him. But that, of course,
had nothing to do with Gertrude's visit, and it was
really very slanderous in old Van Bummel to say that
her affections were like certain covenants known to
the law, because they run with the land.
Aunt Schermerhorn was not a little flattered by
the civilities of the young patroon, and she took
every opportunity to spread the news of his return,
and to comment, with no light exaggerations, upon
his adventures. The town became quite agog with
the tidings, and if Derick had not prudently kept
somewhat aloof from society, he would doubtless
have been lionized beyond all precedent. As it was,
his Scyllas and Charybdes lay thickly strewn around
him, and it required the very skillfulest navigation to
evade the dangerous contact.
Do you remember, Bleecker, said the old lady,
during a morning call from her dashing relative, do
you remember your old uncle Stoffle of Flushing
that is to say, he was your mother's uncle, and was
very old and infirm?
Oh, yesyescertainlyof course, replied
Derick
,
a little startled, for he knew the Cham of Tartary
quite as well; ah, yes, poor fellow; I used to pity
him very much.
Your father sent you there on a visit, just before
you went abroad, you remember?
Yes, said Derick, who felt that he was
certainly
abroad
now, if he had never been before.
How long was it, Bleecker, that you staid there?
Well, I don't remember, Aunty, I declare; I must
have been thereoh, a number of days I should think.
Days!
exclaimed the old lady; why, your aunt
told me the other day when I was down there, that
you were with them four months, and went to school
there, and said she so longed to see you.
Ah, yes, the dear old soulbless meI'd
forgotten
;
this foreign travel and captivity does put things
so out of one's head; but how is the dear creature?
Poorly, poorly, Bleecker; ah, she never held up
her head after that dreadful affair, you know; it
happened
when you were there, I believe?
Ah, certainly, yes, of course, said Derick,
floundering
more and more.
She can't bear to speak of it, you know, and you
must not say a word in her presence that points that
way, for she is coming here soon to make a visit, and
you'll come to see her, of course.
Oh, I won't speak of it, of course not, said Derick;
I wouldn't wound her feelings for the world.
She is coming to stay several weeks with her
pretty daughter Anna, whom you used to romp with
so; but, Bleecker, continued the querist, as the latter,
by way of diverting the dangerous attack, was about
to throw in a few Moors, with piled turbans and
flashing scimetars; Bleeckerhow
was
it about
that affair? I never could get at the whole story,
and you were there, you know: do tell me now.
The old man?
Yes, said Derick, with amazing impudence, and
trusting to the promptings of his inquisitor; the old
man
he
He did take a drop too much at times, poor
fellow
,
didn't he?
Oh, yes, yes, I think he did, beyond doubt, but I
don't like to mention itand then
Yes! said the old lady.
You see
Yes! was again the eager response.
By the way, how did you understand it at the
time? asked Derick, taking a pinch of snuff.
Oh, they
did
say, you know, that he was quite
boozy, and set fire to the bed curtains, trying to get
another dram in the night, and before they could get
to him he was a mere crisp.
Done brownyes, that's about it, I suppose;
wasn't it dreadful; why, when I was in Algiers
And now his poor wife
The great mosque took fire
And his daughter Anna
During prayer-time
And those three little children
And blew up!
continued Derick, raising his
voice, in desperation, scattering heads, trunks and
limbs in every directionnever could be matched
again!
Maircy, Bleecker! how did that happen?
Why, you see there was a kind of smuggling
huckster, who had a shop in the basement, under
pretence of selling fruit and fish to the faithfula
very devout Mussulman he was, and liked to be
under the floor of the mosque, he said, because it was
so holya mere cover, you know; he had nineteen
barrels of powder under there, besides lots of kegs
he called 'em fishthe regular
torpedos
they proved
to be, ha! ha! ha!and so Derick rattled on until
the descent of Miss Van Corlear relieved him from
the dangerous garrulity of his companion.
The fates, meanwhile, were up in arms. They
had been seen several times in wrathful conclave,
and important results were anticipated from their
councils. Distrusting their own fascinations, they
had resolvedthe two senior sisters carrying it by
one against the yellow curlsto import a pretty
cousin from Long Island to enter the lists against
Gertrude
.
She was not only young and handsome, but she
had metallic attractions to no inconsiderable amount,
her well-cured old papa having ceased to smoke and
been buried with his pipe, (peace to their ashes!)
just one year before. She had been left an orphan,
and the disconsolate proprietress of twelve long
stockings-full
of gold, a perfect little sub-treasury, for the
management of which there had already been
numerous
candidates without distinction of party.
Fortified
with this addition to their strength, the fates
plucked up courage, and made several small parties
to which Derick was always invited, and Gertrude
was always, by some oversight, left out. They had
resolved, however, on giving a larger and more
general
party on Christmas Eve, and as there would be
no pretence then for omitting the Van Corlears, the
danger would have to be openly met. They were
not afraid, however, at least they said they were not,
with Miss Katrina Van Derspeigle on their side.
But other events now claim attention. On a dark
evening about ten days prior to Christmas, although
not at all the season for fireworks, the alderman's
house was once more suddenly irradiated by the
blazing face of Seth. He did not come unexpected
either, for Christmas would have brought
him
home
from the antipodes, even if he had been obliged to
return the next day. In roaring spirits too was Seth,
and Jessie was as delighted as her little heart,
laboring
under its Atlas load, could be; and old Burley
sputtered forth a very coherent welcome, and the good
dame first kissed her son, and then, mindful of his
supper, flew to order off the head of a hapless little
rooster, which had retired to his perch without any
surmise at all of so unpleasant an interruption to his
slumbers. Thus was an opportunity afforded to
Jessie
to make inquiries, which she did not hesitate to
do, about poor Harry. Had he really gone to the
wars? and was there much danger? and how long
would he be gone? and had Seth heard,
had
he heard
of Gertrude's most shameful conduct? These and a
dozen other questions had Jessie rattled off, every
one of which Harry, standing in the passage, had
heard, while Seth, grinning and chuckling, stood
speechless before her. But Harry has entered the
room, and has grasped her hand with a cousinly
grasp, and kissed her with a cousinly kiss; but there
was a flush on his cheek and a light in his eye, and
the trace of a vanished tear that never a cousin need
to have called up, and so Jessie put it all down to
the credit of his lost and faithless Gertrude.
Days passed on, and Jessie was delighted to see that
Livingston retained a cheerful disposition under his
heavy misfortunes. But other days came, and more
delighted and more astonished still was Jessie, and
signs and tokens grew more and stronger, until her
little heart fluttered like a frightened bird in its cage,
scared by obtrusive hand within the bars. But she
would not see, and would not believe, for across her
troubled mind came visions still of Gertrude returning
penitent and in tears, to find in Harry a magnanimous
and forgiving lover.
The arrival of Harry and Seth, it will be
remembered
,
had taken place in the evening, and had been
unperceived even by the watchful Van Dingles.
Seth, for a reason of his own, was desirous to keep
it secret, and had no great difficulty in so doing.
Gertrude troubled herself very little about affairs at
home, whither she did not intend to return until after
Christmas; but she would be present at the Van
Dingle party on the evening preceding that festival,
and was expected to look in at home before returning
to the city.
The twenty-fourth of December was just such a
day as every whole-souled man would desire to have
it. It was very cold, and the snow came down in
one continuous day-long descent. There was no
earth, no sky, no houses or trees to be seen; for the
air was literally filled with the little flakes, which
jostled and crowded each other in their haste to get
down in time for Christmas. Three inches to the
hour, by old Burley's weather-gagea huge tin pan
did the snow accumulate all that day, and seemed
just as fresh and brisk at nightfall in its descent as
ever. But scarcely had the first feathery tier touched
the ground before Seth's bay colts, and Seth's sleigh
and buffalo robes and whip, and Seth himself, were
paraded at the door.
I'll do it!
he said,
muttering
to himself as he hitched the horses and hurried
into the house, where he had a brief and laughing
consultation with Harry. Then he bounded back to
the sleigh, and if that and the colts had been the
apparition
which their whitened surface seemed, they
could scarcely have vanished quicker than they did,
to the cracking of the flourished whip, while the
sound of their merry bells came back to the ear long
after they had ceased to be visible. When Seth
returned, which he did a few hours subsequently at
the same dashing speed, he had a companion; a glum,
gruff man, from whom the frightened children fled,
for they had gathered around the sleigh, thinking it
might possibly be Santa Claus. But Santa Claus
would come notwithstanding, some time during the
night. Did not they know that? Had he ever
disappointed
them? Oh, when
would
it be dark, that
they might go to bed and pass through an oblivious
night to their Christmas morning gifts! Such were
the children's thoughts.
Seth conducted the stranger at once to his own
room, and having provided him with pipes and
tobacco
,
those genuine Dutch weapons for killing time, he
left him to his own reflections, or probably to that
more perfect state of repose, a vacuity of mind. Still
white with unmelted snow, he next entered Harry's
apartment, and to the inquiry of the latter, whether
he had found him, answered only by a wink and a
snap of the fingers.
Has no one seen him? said Harry.
Only fatherwho mistook him, I think, for you.
The alderman's sight is failing, certainly, rejoined
Harry, with a laugh.
But Harry seemed absent-minded, and Seth and
Towser went out to play with the children in the
snow. Happy children were they, and a happy fellow
was Seth, and quickly did they rear their snowy
castle
withoutpoor Towser wagging his tail, and
looking
joyfully on, little thinking that he was to be shut
up within, to whine piteously through a small chink,
while the children clapped their hands, and called
upon him to chase some imaginary prey.
But the hours passed on, and the short day drew to
a close, and Jessie was sitting alone in the parlor,
pondering deeply, joyously, fearfully. Tears were in
her eyes, and strange thoughts and fearful misgivings
passed through her mind. But her bounding heart
has answered to an approaching step without, and
7
Harry is once more at her side, with a changed
countenance
and a subdued and faltering voice. Subdued
and faltering, although it was but on common topics
that he spoke. The weather, the holidays, Seth and
his steedswhat was there in these to change the
voice of Harry, or to drive the fading hues from
Jessie's
cheek of snow? But the twilight is growing
less, and lower still is Harry's voice, and cruel, cruel
are his wordselse why those blinding tears of
Jessie
,
and that averted face? What is it that, with
fixed gaze, she seeswhat
can
she see through that
snow-coated window, and through the snowy air
without
?
Not a word has she answered, not one single
word for all the many that Harry has so earnestly
spoken, and she has passed, still speechless, from the
room, and entered into her own. Safe now in the
privacy
of her own apartment, her tumultuous emotions
gradually subsided, and she knew then, and not till
then, how exceeding great was her joy. What was
it to her that Harry had lost titles and estates? Not
for these bubbles had the wealth of her affection been
bartered, and their loss had no power to awaken a
sigh in her heart. Others, indeed, would say that
Livingston, the wealthy and honored, would never
have stooped to wed with her, but what cared she for
the slanderous world? She did care, though, a little,
for she thought of the fates, and she thought of
Gertrude's sharp, malicious wit; but deeply at the
next moment did she blame herself for yielding to
such reflections in the hour of her greatest joy.
But there is a knocking at Jessie's door, and a
younger brother's eager voice is heard without. He
has come with a well-enveloped package, charged
only to say that it is a Christmas Box from cousin
Harry. Many were the envious wrappers that
interposed
between the eager fingers of Jessie, and the
mysterious
treasure; and when all were removed, a
beautiful
ornamented box of alabaster was revealed,
embossed with gold. On opening the lid,
glistening
against the crimson velvet lining was seen a
set of costly jewelry, a necklace of pearls, and a
watch and chain of gold, articles which in those
days were unknown to any, save the very
wealthiest
classes. Astonishment and delight held Jessie
for a moment breathless, but on looking again
she perceived a small folded note in the writing of
Livingston. There were but few words within, but
they revealed to her the whole overwhelming truth,
that Harry,
her
Harry, rejected of Gertrude, and
slighted by the world, was still the rich and powerful
patroon.
CHAPTER XII.
Old
Baltus Van Dingle's house had never known
such a lighting up as it received on Christmas Eve, in
the year 1690. Why should not the old fellow loosen
his purse-strings a little? Was there not a
prospective
patroon to be won, and might he not be secured,
if not for one of his own tender daughters, at least for
some branch of the family? It would be something,
at any rate, to keep him out of the clutch of those Van
Corlears. Such were Baltus's thoughts, and he saw
no reason, for his part, why Bleecker should not take
a fancy to Eve; for Eve certainly was handsome, he
said, although a little cross-eyed. Her nose turned
up a hair's breadth too much, perhaps, but what of
that? He had read of a race of South Sea islanders,
whose probosces all pointed zenith-ward, being
carefully
elevated in infancy by maternal hands. Their
noses were turned up, so to speak, against the whole
world. Figuratively speaking, if Baltus had ever
spoken figuratively, he might have said there were
national propensities of that kind, elsewhere than in
the South Seas.
It would be difficult, even if it were not foreign to
the purpose of this history, to give anything like an
accurate view of the party at Van Dingle's. Let it
suffice that it was a fashionable one for the age, and
that many of the stiff and starched aristocracy were
there. Not that it in any degree resembled
a jam
of the present century, got up to solve some
mathematical
problem as to the number of mortals who
could possibly stand within four given walls. There
may have been thirty people, all told, and counting
old Alderman Stoutenburgh only one, who on any fair
division would have made three. If they had supper,
they sat down to it in an orderly manner, and did not
congregate in crowds, peering piggishly over each
other's shoulders, at the tempting viands beyond their
reach. That swinish simile, however, is hereby
rescinded
;
for politeness may be, and doubtless is, a
common feature even of crowds with pinioned elbows.
But porkers are really never polite. You couldn't
imagine a pig, passing a potato to his companion,
with a bow, instead of eating it himself, or disavowing
his appetite, and resigning to another an eligible stand
at the trough. But this is manifest digression.
It might well be supposed that Derick would be a
little backward about strutting in his borrowed plumes
before such an assemblage, but he was the most
reckless
of fellows, and could not deny himself this choice
bit of fun. It was to be positively his last appearance
on any stage, and he meant to make the most of it.
He was exceedingly cautious, however, not to excite
undue expectations in the susceptible hearts of any of
his fair suitors. Studiously polite was the new
patroon
on all hands, and none could claim and none
complain of any monopoly of his attentions. Dimples
or wrinkles, all were the same to Derick. Even
Katrina Van Derspeigle did not melt him; and what
was more provoking to the fates, she did not try.
While Gertrude was discharging repeated broadsides
of witty speeches and tender glances at the enemy,
and the Van Dingles were momentarily dreading to
see him strike his flag, and drop alongside, their own
powerful ally was sailing off in another direction, and
levelling the whole artillery of her charms at another
foe. And who was that, do you ask? Why, who
should it be but Seth
our
Seth, whose good-natured
face had made its appearance in the crowd, much to
the astonishment of all. He had come by virtue of a
general invitation to the family, and was, as he
everywhere
was, very welcome. Some cool inquiries were
necessarily made of him as to Mr. Livingston's health
and welfare, to which he replied in terms which,
although
seemingly quite explicit, threw no light
whatever
upon Harry's whereabout. The subject was not
urged, for, as may well be supposed, it was very
delicate
ground to tread upon; quite, indeed, of the
quicksand
order, both to Gertrude and the fates.
Miss Katrina's fancy for Seth seemed to be fully
reciprocated
;
for she was a warm-hearted, generous
little girl, full of fun, and, as the event proved, not at
all disposed to be kept in leading-strings by her two
staid senior cousins. Eve copied her graceful
gambols
,
and played off seventeen in quite a frisky,
kittenly
manner. 'Twould be a matchSeth and
Katrina
everybody
could see that at a glance. The
question was settled. The stockings that were full of
gold, and the stockings that were not full of gold,
were all done for. That sub-treasurer was appointed,
and all other candidates might thenceforth retire, as
they very discreetly did, and seemed quite oblivious
of ever having made any advances in the premises
whatever.
Gertrude was in high spirits. She had recovered
from the shock occasioned by the late laceration of
her affections, and was entirely herself again. Never
had she been more beautiful, and never had the
coruscations
of her wit been more brilliant. So
confident
had she grown in the power of her fascinations,
that she considered her prize already won, although,
doubtless for good reasons, there were as yet no
outward
signs of such a result. Not a little did she
congratulate
herself on the master-stroke of policy, by
which, in the very nick of time, she had got rid of
poor Harry. She would really, however, see that
Bleecker did something nice for him when he came
to the property. And while looking idly around the
room for a moment, she made a little mental
memorandum
to tell Jessie how disconsolate poor Harmon
seemed, sitting as stiff and as still as the tongs in one
corner for the whole evening, and all because she was
absent.
Aunt Schermerhorn was there, but the poor old
soul had scarcely a chance to speak to dear Bleecker, so
thronged was he by the belles. She found an
opportunity
at last, however, and pressed boldly up, because
she felt that she was the bearer of good news.
Who on airth do you think has come? she said,
addressing Derick: who, of all the world! and
so
anxious to see you?
Derick could not guess, but looked a little startled.
Why, old cousin Bartholomew, of Schagticoke!
The dl! exclaimed Derick; that is to say,
I'm delighted, I mean, as he caught sight of his
father, hobbling slowly across the room.
He's very anxious to see you, for sure, said the
old lady.
Just behind Derick and his bevy of beauties, and
nearly opposite to where the old man had entered
the room, was another door, near which stood Seth
and Katrina.
I shall be transported with delight to see the old
gentleman, rejoined Derick, who had now regained
his easy self-possession; beg him to wait for me one
moment.
Where is he? where is he? grumbled forth the
old man, with a bull-frog sort of voice; let's see him,
cousin Polly.
My horses are at the door, whispered Seth, as
Derick glided past him, answering only with a wink
and a smile.
Where is he? repeated the stranger triumphantly,
as much as to say, It's all humbug, you can't show
me any such person.
Amazed at Bleecker's inexplicable conduct, no one
replied, and the old man, who had caught sight of
his retiring son, at once hurried off in pursuit. The
room continued silent, a sound of voices was heard
without, then the jingling of bells, and old
Bartholomew
came stumping back.
I saw him; I saw him, he said, laughing loudly;
it's my son Derick, Polly!didn't you know Derick?
La! so it is! exclaimed Aunt Schermerhorn.
Talk to me about
Bleecker Van Ness!
continued
the old man, excitedly; don't I know that he has been
dead, coming seven years next Spring? Haven't I
seen a copy of the what-d'ye-call-it there, of the
coroner
that sot on him on the coast of Ireland, with a
dozen others, taken off the wreck of the Irispshaw!
and with this polite valedictory he left the room.
The consternation, fortunately for Gertrude, was too
general at first to admit of her own alarm being
especially
noticed, for her sensations of shame and
anguish were really stunning in their intensity. She
felt herself going up, as it were, with an exploded
mine, and anticipating momentarily the shock of the
descent. Duped, fooled, exposed to the ridicule of all,
had but the floor and earth yawned beneath her then,
she would have leaped, gladly, into the chasm. She
managed soon to make her escape from the room,
whence poor Eve had already fled. Katrina, who
had no cause for mortification, stood her ground boldly,
supported by Seth, and together with the remaining
part of the company, who were gathered in little knots
about the room, continued for some time to discuss
these remarkable occurrences. The opportune
appearance
of old Bartholomew had been in part only
the result of Seth's management. He had come down
to the city, influenced by the combined motives of a
desire to visit his relations, to find his scape-grace
son, and to dispose of a load of frozen poultry for the
Christmas and New Year's markets. Seth had
accidentally
heard of his presence in the city, through Van
Bummel, and had secured his attendance in the
manner
that has been described, instructing him at what
time to make his appearance. Derick was not in the
secret of the last scene, which was a little private fun
got up by Seth for his own amusement. He could
think, indeed, of no better way to bring about the
dnouement
, which ought not to be longer deferred,
and if he subjected his coadjutor to a little extra
embarrassment
,
he at least provided him with a ready
way of escape.
Although the shock to Gertrude was violent, she
soon began to rally. She reflected, while on her way
home, that, fortunately, Derick had paid her no very
marked attention, and that whatever suspicion might
exist, there was no proof of her having had any
designs
upon him. No one, she thought, but Jessie, even
knew of her quarrel with Livingston, and she by no
means despaired of regaining her lost ground in that
quarter. Harry was a good easy soul, and was, no
doubt, still pining for her, and if she could only once
meet him, she had but little fear for the result. What
then was her surprise and joy, on entering her own
parlor, to behold Harry, whom she had supposed to be
on the Canadian frontier, sitting quietly beside Jessie
laughing and talking, and seeming very much at home.
How truly, she thought, had she estimated his
character
.
Most magnanimous of men! she exclaimed,
throwing
herself into a graceful attitude, and applying her
kerchief to her eyes, do I indeed find you here
awaiting
my return? How can
such
generosity ever be
repaid?
Poor simple Jessie, accustomed to defer, in all
things, to her imperious sister, actually trembled for
one unreflecting moment, lest Harry should relent.
It was but a moment.
Miss Van Corlear has no reason to applaud my
magnanimity, said Livingston, rising and speaking
slowly; she has not found me here awaiting her
return
or
expecting itor entertaining any other
feeling
in regard to her movements than that of the most
perfect indifference.
If a railroad locomotive could be endued with
consciousness
and sensation at the moment of bounding
off the track under a forty mile per hour headway,
it would doubtless feel very much as Gertrude did at
this moment. For she had been quite in earnest in her
belief as to the object of Livingston's return. But
his words now, and his manner, and the frightened
looks of Jessie, and the
tout-ensemble
of affairs around
her, convinced her that there was no hope.
Overwhelmed
with mortification, yet partially sustained by
her invisible handmaiden, Pride, she beat a rapid
retreat
to her room. On the next morning,
notwithstanding
it was Christmas day, she made good her escape
to the city, under plea of some engagement with Aunt
Schermerhorn, with whom she had the good sense to
remain for the next three weeks.
At the end of that period, on a fine cold morning of
January, a very noble but very restless pair of horses
and a very sumptuous sleigh packed with divers trunks
and boxes, were seen standing in front of Van
Corlear's
house, thronged by peering children and
servants
,
much to the annoyance of a pompous negro
driver, who begged them to have the goodness to
stand a little back, and make way for the pat-ter-roon
and his lady. And he spoke none too soon; for the
front door had opened, and Harry and Jessie, muffled
and cloaked for travel, and Burley and his vrow, and
Seth and the children and Towser, came crowding
out, all full of a few last words, not excepting the
dog, whose remarks were probably about as
intelligible
just then as those of his companions. Jessie was
a little paler than usual, for the marriage ceremony
had but just been performed, but the cold air soon
brought back her color and her spirits.
Mind, Seth, we shall see you in the Spring? she
called back as the horses began to move.
And Katrina, added Harry.
Seth colored, and making a significant gesture to
the driver, the latter brought around his whip with a
double-extra flourish, and they were gone.
They are gone, gentle reader, for sure. We shall
never see them again. Seth saw them, however, the
very next Spring, and so did Katrina, and very
welcome
visiters they were too at Kenterhook, and many
was the merry day's sport with horse and hound, that
Harry and Seth enjoyed in the wild forests which
formed a part of the Livingston manor.
Burley was perfectly contented and perfectly happy
in the fulfilment of his ambitious dreams. The
patroon was his son-in-law, although it is doubtful
whether or not he ever fully comprehended the affair.
Indeed he was too wise to trouble himself about
processes
as long as his end was gained.
Gertrude was fully humbled, but it is to be feared,
was not much reformed, until later years. After
many ineffectual attempts at conquest, she contented
herself with acquiring the legal right to teaze the little
remaining life out of poor Harmon Van Dingle, a labor
of love which proved neither very arduous, nor very
long protracted.
Derick retired to private life, not fully reconciled to
his loss of wealth and station, or altogether free from
self-reproach. That his duplicity had produced a
good result, could not, he properly argued, render it
justifiable; but he consoled himself by the belief that
his wild oats were now all sown, and he determined
henceforth to turn his attention to more profitable
crops. He became, indeed, a good, orderly citizen,
although with such talents for intrigue and diplomacy,
he would, undoubtedly, under other circumstances,
have made no small ado in the world. Had he lived
in our day, his path to political distinction would have
been unobstructed, unless, possibly, by the
pre-occupancy
of a few kindred spirits.
The two senior fates continued single; but on the
sudden death of old Baltus, a few years later, bachelor
Van Bummel, finding that the estate would cut up into
pretty large slices, made some very abrupt proposals
for Eve, which that young lady, with modest avidity,
accepted. She could not call to mind exactly on
what occasion she had captivated the lawyer, but as
she had long considered him to be a gentleman of
taste and discrimination, she was in no wise surprised
at his choice. Marriage meliorated the harshness of
Eve's disposition very materially, and her husband,
who had long tried the flowerless path of celibacy,
was tolerably well contented with his fate. If she
was not the very best of wives, the land at least was
of a good quality, and in this world, thought Van
Bummel, we must take the bitter with the sweet.